The big return of the Czech loser is approaching.
Pavel Francouz called up to the NHL
Czech ice hockey goaltender Pavel Francouz, who is going through a difficult period in his career, returns to the NHL.
The 31-year-old native of Pilsen will be on the bench, and soon could find himself in the goal.
The former goalkeeper of Litvínov, Plzeň or Russian Chelyabinsk was injured during preparation for the NHL in October this year.
He was replaced at the half-way point of the game with Vegas and has not been seen on NHL ice since.
The incident happened as the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to another.
"Pavel Francouz will be out approximately three to four weeks with a lower-body injury," the Avalanche announced at the beginning of October.
His return to the net in the NHL ended up lasting more than two months.
He was called up from the farm Sunday morning U.S. time, where he caught four games and showed his old form.
In the AHL, he recorded a save percentage of 94.5%.
The graduate of the Plzeň hockey school wants to finally make it and prove that he belongs in the best league in the world.
He had trouble with his hip in the last season and in the shortened pandemic season, he didn't play a single game.
In the NHL, "Francík" has played 36 games, and his success rate is 92.3%.
Charles's Christmas card features Camille's mask, William and Kate pose in Jordan
British Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photo taken during a trip to Jordan as their Christmas card this year.
Prince Charles also shared his wish, using a photo of his wife, Camilla, helping him put on a face mask at the races.
The British news channel BBC reported this on its website.
The wishes are sent to friends, colleagues and charities they work with.
The photo was taken somewhere in the desert.
The Duchess of Cambridge is dressed in a long khaki summer dress, as is Princess Charlotte.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing shorts and a shirt with a collar just like Princes George and Louis.
It is not clear who took the photograph or when it was taken.
Last year, the royal family posed for a photograph intended as a Christmas card in front of a bale of straw in front of a pile of wood at their country home in Norfolk.
The heir to the throne, Prince Charles, and his wife Camilla also published a picture that will serve as a Christmas greeting.
Photographer Sam Hussein captured him at the races in Ascot in June.
Charles, who has a cap on his head and a mask on his face, helps Camille put on her mask, which matches her light-colored dress.
According to efotbal.cz, Slavia promised Berbr a million for the title, Tvrdík denied it.
Prague - Investigators in the current corruption case are allegedly working on the assumption that the accused former deputy chairman of the Czech Football Association, Roman Berbr, was promised a million Czech crowns from Slavia Prague for the league title in the 2018/19 season.
The website efotbal.cz reported this, stating that it had obtained part of the police files.
The chairman of the board of directors of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, stated that the white-and-reds did not engage in any corrupt activities.
The website published a transcript of police recordings, in which Slavia is mainly represented by its former sporting director Jan Nezmar, who left the championship club last summer.
According to the report, the former influential official of the red-and-whites was in frequent contact with Berbr as well as the former sporting director of the then second-division Vyšehrad, Roman Rogoz, who is also among the accused in the case.
The investigators were allegedly working with information that Slavia had promised Berbatov a financial reward for winning the title.
In 2019, the SK Slavia Prague team won the first league title.
The police authority had knowledge that Roman (Berbr) was promised a million-dollar bribe by SK Slavia Prague functionaries for winning the league, the server quoted from the file.
The day after, according to the criminal investigators, Berbr met not only with Nezmar, but also with the chairman of the Slavia board, Tvrdík.
According to the server, it is not clear whether the police are still dealing with this information.
Tvrdík denied any corruption.
Between 2015 and 2017, we actively tried to change the state of affairs in Czech football and offered an alternative to its development.
We have never committed any illegal act, we have never tried to influence referees in violation of the fair play rules, and we have not provided anyone with any financial compensation in this regard," said Tvrdík for Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar insults some of Slavia's former dark-skinned players and also defames his former boss, Tvrdík.
The case of alleged match-fixing through referees was triggered by a police raid in mid-October last year at several locations, including the FAČR headquarters in Prague.
Berbr is the highest-ranking person involved in the scandal, and he is no longer involved in any football functions.
In mid-January, he was released from custody, just like the former sports director of Vyšehrad, Rogoz.
Helicopters, tanks and BVPs are LARPing the Cold War.
The new tanks will be of a fundamentally worse type (the gunners will have to fire from a armoured cabin and carry the cartridges by hand without protection).
The cars - Toyota Hi-luxes - are new and good
Trucks and various armoured vehicles - at a decent level, in addition, it has been possible to get rid of the Praga V3S in specialist units.
Aircraft: combat - decent, but at the end of the lease, passenger - too small with a short range, but modern.
Drones - few and only small types with no combat potential
Rockets - we don't have any (but we produce them and export them abroad)
NGOs: Cold War, outdated; short-range: good, modern, relatively good numbers.
I have a story like that.
I have my hunting grounds right next to the city.
The nutria were climbing out of the river and doing damage to the crops, so I was there to sit on them.
When I arrived, I saw a fisherman on the other side of the river.
I didn't want to make a scene, so I quietly sat down and the guy probably didn't notice me.
I was hoping he would leave before anything came out, but of course the fox came out after a while.
I let her come to 40 meters before I decided to shoot.
The poor fisherman almost pooped his pants, he was waving his headtorch all over the place, so I called out to him that it was a fox.
When I got down from the saddle, I was exhausted.
In other words, a man's meadow can be a prude.
On the other hand, it's not a war, it would take a lot of coincidences for something to happen, you'd probably be seen on thermal imaging, which almost everyone has today.
So put it in a visible place, put your expensive things in your sleeping bag, and you should be fine.
Vojtěch versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of the Interior bought the respirators significantly cheaper than the Ministry of Health
The state, which is responsible for buying and distributing face masks, masks and respirators for professions closest to the coronavirus, has spent billions of crowns in recent weeks on their purchase.
The iRozhlas server compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that on a single day, the prices of respirators varied by hundreds of crowns.
Why did the prices move so dramatically?
Which authorities have been frugal?
And why did others buy it for more?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with iRozhlas editor Dominika Kubištová.
I respect the soldiers and the army (I am probably not affected by the memories of the ČSLA, which the older generations went through), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't even have large stockpiles of equipment that the trained reservists could use, we don't even have modern equipment for the current professionals, and on top of that, modern equipment is getting more and more complicated, so the abilities of the reservists will rapidly decline over time.
To this, modern conventional conflicts, where anyone can be deployed, will take place very quickly, and there won't be time to train someone again.
Finally, the reservists/territorial defence are of great importance for countries like Ukraine, where it is necessary to conduct mass guerrilla warfare, and it is also a necessity to deter the enemy.
In the Czech Republic, we will only be able to fight in a conflict of such size and intensity that guerrilla warfare will be irrelevant, and we do not have the appropriate geography for that.
Above all, we don't have individual skill.
And that's not even the worst of it.
The worst thing is that half of them are playing like they have it.
Then such situations occur, where you look like a guy who missed an open net 2 minutes ago, drives into the attack alone between 2 or even 3 Swiss players and ask yourself "what do you think is going to happen now?".
Of course, they will take him as an average taxpayer.
The situation with this skill of "beating a defender" is so bad that I have been honestly surprised when I see that our attacker managed to beat one of the opponent's players.
Early signs
The Covid-19 pandemic is slowing down, however, experts do not expect any major change in the coming weeks.
The pressure on hospitals will continue for some time, according to statistical models, and a new unknown has been added to the pandemic equation: the Omicron variant, which is very likely to spread faster than the currently dominant Delta.
At the same time, it is not yet possible to say with absolute certainty whether it can cause a more serious course of the disease, to what extent vaccination or post-infection immunity acquired from a previous infection can help.
This week, however, an unexpected phenomenon on the plus side entered the COVID equation: the possibility of treatment.
The new drug, the antiviral molnupiravir, has arrived in the Czech Republic. This drug reduces the risk of a severe course of the disease and the associated hospitalisation by a third, and it is possible to take it at home.
Soon it should also be joined by Pfizer's paxlovid drug, which, according to preliminary results, has a success rate of up to 85 per cent.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic, in addition to the hope of expanding the portfolio of tools useful in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic, have also highlighted the question of how the Czech administration is prepared for the arrival of new drugs.
As mentioned, the first one to reach Czech patients will be Merck's molnupiravir.
The company ended up at the front of the line because the drug had been in development for a long time before the current pandemic, with the aim of finding a suitable treatment for a viral disease of horses in South America.
These studies often overlook the fact that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
are generally less open and don't share their opinions as freely.
In contrast, Eastern Europeans, and especially us Czechs, are used to speaking "as if a beak grew on our nose".
So you do research where you ask people if they like Muslims.
Most people in the Czech Republic will tell you straight out that they don't.
In the West, they will tell you how much they love immigration, how everyone should help them and how we Czechs are a racist bunch.
And then they go and vote for parties like the AfD.
They fear cancel culture, saying this in public means losing your job and media lynching.
Then in the polls it looks nice, the West is good, the East is bad.
But they'll find out what people really think.
In France, Le Pen and Zemmour both have over 20% according to the polls.
We even know that the objects are three and completely identical.
Identical for the reason of rotating units, so the soldiers don't have to relearn where things are, all the buildings are essentially the same.
One is the Atom Museum Brdy, and the other two are abandoned.
It is funny that the USSR did not want to have nuclear warheads on its own territory for security or speed reasons due to its western location.
Only the warheads were stored in the underground shelters (there are two in each maple tree), not the entire missile, as it is said.
If it was necessary to deploy this weapon, a special unit would arrive, pick up the head and mount it on some kind of carrier.
In addition to the museum sycamore, the rest of the trees are in a dilapidated state.
In the second grade of elementary school, we had a Gypsy classmate, and we were together for 4 years.
He was pretty good, made some good jokes, he was a bit over the top sometimes, but he was like our mascot.
Everybody was talking to him, he often came back and wanted to explain something, he was almost always there, he did sports with us, he didn't steal snacks or phones, he came neatly dressed.
He also went to outdoor schools, did all sorts of monkey business, but he was fine, he never had any mishaps.
In the 8th or 9th grade, the siblings, the Roma, entered the same class, other classes.
Soon after, they beat up a teacher, the police were often there, they threatened and bullied other students...
I occasionally sell things on the classifieds (old stuff, things I don't need, etc.) and I've often sold them to Gypsies, they always had the money, they didn't try to haggle with me, the communication was calm.
I even sold a car like this, the guy called a month later, saying that he had already transferred it to his name...
I say myself that I'm not a racist, I don't care if someone is white, black, yellow, blue or anything else, as long as they act as they should in a decent society (work, function, don't beat women, just normal behaviour).
But when someone comes, they stretch out their hand, they move into flats and houses, they leave a mess around them, they cause problems... it doesn't matter what colour they are, but I won't like them.
I have no problem with African migrants if they get involved, start a business, work, learn the language (not necessarily, at least English), and respect our culture.
If they believe in Allah, I don't care, as long as they respect my traditions and culture, I will respect theirs.
A young woman died in a car crash in Prachatice
"The young woman suffered serious multiple injuries and, despite resuscitation efforts, unfortunately succumbed to her injuries at the scene," said Zuzana Fajtlová, the spokesperson for the South Bohemian Emergency Medical Service, to Právo.
The accident was probably caused by the driver who was taking the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of the Peugeot was probably travelling from the village of Žíchovec towards the village of Bavorov, and for yet unknown reasons veered into oncoming traffic in a bend.
After a collision with a Skoda Octavia, the Peugeot ended up on its roof off the road, said South Bohemian police spokeswoman Štěpánka Schwarzová.
The young driver of the Peugeot sustained very serious injuries in the crash.
He sustained multiple injuries and was trapped in the car.
After being freed, he had to be given emergency pre-hospital care and was then airlifted to the hospital in České Budějovice in a stable condition, said rescuer Fajtlová.
She added that the man in the second car suffered minor chest injuries and was taken to hospital.
New rules for parcels from non-EU countries, customers often fail to provide details
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
It mainly collects collector's cards.
"Usually it's tens of dollars, say from ten dollars upwards, where it still pays to import, especially from Japan, where the post is often free," explains the collector.
Since October, ordering small parcels has become slightly more expensive, and they must now add VAT, and pass on details to the post office for customs procedures.
He will receive an e-mail stating that the customs officers are awaiting the arrival of the package.
Then all you have to do is fill in the information about the package, and if the seller did not include VAT in the sale, the customs office will calculate it from the total amount for the package and delivery.
If the recipient does not take care of the customs clearance themselves, they must also add the transport fee to the total amount.
According to Lukáš Neuheisl, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I tick one or two check boxes, attach two attachments, and I'm done.
For me, it is usually a matter of five minutes, says Neuheisl.
Not all deliveries go off without a hitch, though.
Due to new customs regulations, the daily number of packages received at the international post office in Prague fell from 60,000 to 15,000.
According to Czech Post, the problem is also that people do not respond to requests for information needed to complete customs procedures.
There are currently 30,000 parcels on the international post, which we have to process.
If people were to fill in all the information that is needed and fill it in on time, we would be about halfway there, says Matyáš Vitík, a spokesman for the Czech Post.
Solving the Inflation Problem
See the title, how would you suggest a solution to the current inflation?
Currently we are at 9.9% inflation and it is expected to rise further.
What do you think it should do to slow down or compensate for this growth?
We can see, for example, the reduction of VAT on foodstuffs and PHM in Poland. Is this the way for you?
What do you think will happen, which is inevitable with where it's headed?
Prices are rising faster than wages, and it's inevitable that people won't be able to afford the things they need, especially energy.
How much did you get added, for example (who is an employee)?
They added 2% to my gross this year, which is a joke, but luckily I have a similar income from a business that I run alongside my job.
Would someone be able to explain to me why convicted violent offenders are sent to prison for only 6 months?
I just can't get my head around how the court can send such a beast to jail for only 6 months, just to do it again as soon as he gets out.
6 months is nothing compared to the victim having trauma for years, negatively affecting her sexual relationships and relationships in general.
Not to mention, a rape victim may never recover from it.
Will this deter potential future rape victims from coming forward?
The man from Hroby "shot" his girlfriend from Kostomlaty
The man from Hrob unwittingly helped the police officers to secure his nationally wanted girlfriend from Kostomlat, for whom an arrest warrant had been issued.
He summoned her himself.
But he went about it in a roundabout way.
First, he approached a passerby and made up a story that he had been robbed.
Officers responded to the 911 call and were amazed when the alleged "victim" told them he had made the whole thing up to get the officers to respond to the scene.
In fact, he just wanted to ask the police officers how to file a report with the Police of the Czech Republic.
When the officers checked the identity of the man and his girlfriend, they discovered that the woman was on the national wanted list and a warrant for her arrest had been issued.
The case is therefore being dealt with by the police.
A genuine question for people here, do you consider our country to be Slavic?
I personally believe that we are no longer ethnically or culturally Slavic, but I would like to hear your opinion.
Otherwise, I obviously agree with the meme. It's a shame that Churchill wasn't able to secure the liberation of Prague by the USA :')
Of course, I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's quite a question whether a rational person can really believe in something without evidence, just because it might be beneficial.
I personally would not consider such a case to be true faith.
I cannot agree with Pascal here, there are, if I am not mistaken, around ten thousand different religions in the world.
Which god or gods should one then choose?
I would suggest it's pretty likely that in one of those thousands of religions, there's at least one god who will punish you in a nasty way if you believe in a different god.
However, even the Decalogue states that there is no other god than Jahve's.
In such a case, wouldn't it be more rational to refrain from believing in any god at all, rather than risk picking the wrong one out of the thousands of gods and the one true god that I didn't pick will send me to hell or some similar place?
Others: Voluntary training followed by inclusion in the reserves.
The Swiss model is somewhat similar.
X months of training (in different specializations, X months in one) and under the command of professionals with practical experience.
If you do well, you can get a pro offer.
Such a thing would be useful to all branches of the AČR.
It could be done in collaboration with the University of Defense.
We can talk about it like this: The collaboration between the education sector and industry is constantly being repeated, companies are hunting in schools, and there is some kind of overlap, where the workforce migrates from educational institutions to employment.
Not only during adolescence, but this process goes on continuously, each of us is constantly learning something new, moving from one field to another, etc.
Such cross-pollination should also work between the civilian and military sectors.
I also see it as a way to build some kind of relationship between the citizen and the army, which is an institution that guarantees that Russia, Germany or a Mongolian invader will never invade here again.
I find it funny how you consider NATO as something carved in stone, we have allies and they will protect us if things go wrong.
No, don't please.
It only takes one election in the US that will twist their budget and the whole NATO will go down the drain.
The English exchange us for Russian roubles, the Germans exchange us for Russian gas, and the Poles have already shown that they can just turn their backs and take what they want.
The only thing that works as a long-term guarantee of independence is a well-armed army and a population that knows how to operate the military technology of their time.
Today, every teenager can drive a remote-controlled vehicle, so why not.
We don't need border fortifications, they are useless today, but a clever teenager with a remote-controlled device will be able to deal with it.
How to avoid drowning in the box-tipping tsunami
You unwrap the presents under the Christmas tree and all of a sudden you're surrounded by boxes and packing materials at home?
This "waste" is being re-used by online shops that are short of packaging materials.
A map has been created of shops that will welcome your used boxes.
And not just at Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That's why it's a shame to treat them as single-use waste.
Anyone can bring cardboard boxes, plastic or paper fillers to the participating stores (the KAMsNIM.cz project map contains nearly 150 of them).
This will support small businesses, reduce the amount of waste produced and also avoid overcrowded blue bins.
The shops themselves welcome the packaging, which is currently in short supply on the market, and also the saved money, as the cardboard packaging has increased in price by 50% over the last period.
In the eyes of ecologically-minded customers, I am strengthening my brand.
One of these shops is TIERRA VERDE, a manufacturer of eco-cosmetics and eco-cosmetics.
The boxes and packing materials are brought to us in Popůvky near Brno by individuals who have accumulated them at home, but we also hear from companies with whom we have agreed regular collections of discarded cardboard.
We will use it to package shipments from our e-shop.
Thanks to individuals and companies, we are creating a more considerate world.
Our wish is to preserve the resources and beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierry.
However, the www.KAMsNIM.cz application shows not only collection points for packaging.
It serves as a search engine if you need to get rid of anything (where to take sorted household waste, where to deliver expired medicines, tyres, retired electrical appliances, batteries, light sources, large-volume waste, etc.).
All waste can thus end up in the right place, and reusable items can find their second home.
The project's map already includes more than 100,000 such places.
"More and more collection points, re-use centres, textile containers, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places that help find a use for things that would otherwise become waste are being added to it," adds Miroslav Kubásek, one of the authors of the app from the Ukliďme Česko association.
I think it's more concerning that technology is so simple and idiot-proof that children who use a computer or phone to play games don't learn basic computer skills.
Recently there has been a problem (especially in English articles) that university students do not understand the principle of computer components.
Because things like Google Photos or Apple's photo app or really mobile phones in general just hide the underlying filesystem with folders and just put everything on one screen in the app.
They can use the technique from childhood, but above all, they should learn something.
Let's rewrite history, seriously
Emmanuel Macron unveiled the priorities of France's EU presidency - beginning in January - over the weekend, and it was grand.
Macron spoke for over an hour, during which he unveiled the logo for the presidency, called for the protection of Europeans - at work and on the street - and mentioned so many actions that they cannot be completed in half a year.
French politicians like it that way and so do the voters.
Macron's supporters, divided between the right and the left, agree on little, but they do agree on Europe.
And in France, there will be new elections for the head of state in April.
The election calendar also influenced the priorities.
The French leader, among other things, mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is ready to create conditions for such work by historians.
A number of commentators were quick to criticise Macron's pro-European propaganda and rewriting of history.
In fact, they are trying to prevent the rewriting of history.
Far-right French presidential candidate Eric Zemmour is currently touring France with the claim that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during the Second World War, was not so bad, and he is having some success with it.
Let's take Macron's idea of a single history textbook seriously and not look at what is happening in France.
Is it needed?
Students in European countries are often taught history as a story of us versus them, and never as a story of the whole.
Spaniards, French, and Czechs are learning who beat whom in which battle.
But without a wise cantor, they won't know the wider context of the event.
The film of the year is Quo vadis, Aida?
The Czech "Mice" didn't win.
The story, which returns to the Srebrenica massacre of 1995, also won awards for direction and best actress Jasna Duričić.
This year's Karlovy Vary Film Festival was at the top of the audience rankings.
In Berlin, the best actor award went to Anthony Hopkins for the film The Father.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like "having the flu/being under the weather" I had diarrhea for a couple of days and didn't really feel like smoking...
It was worse than a regular flu.
I don't get diarrhea with the flu.
(Just my personal experience. I'm not saying that it's true for everyone)
Christmas book tips
The Christmas double issue, which will be published on 20 December, will contain the traditional literary supplement.
And along with her, cultural tips will also come out.
We are adding the books to this digital edition for you, our subscribers, so that you have enough time to buy the books as Christmas presents.
The prose texts follow on from the previous similar collection Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot.
Another helping of observation of the world and description of everyday things with uncommonly poetic attention to detail, depth, and atmosphere.
In his second novel, the photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of a small town and Czech society.
The story of returning to one's roots, which turns out to be just a longed-for illusion.
The bohemist and comparatist transfers the fairy tale of Red Riding Hood to the setting of a contemporary village.
Its delivery is more brutal than the folk versions and escalates into a horror of emotional emptiness.
And that the path back to instincts is shorter than we are willing to admit
The author tells a less sentimental story about returning from emigration in his penultimate novel than we are used to listening to.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to make it work.
The trains will start running according to the new timetable, in some places the operators will change
From Sunday, trains will be running according to a new timetable.
The biggest change is the replacement of transport providers on some routes, for example between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where RegioJet is replacing České dráhy.
For most lines, only the departure time will be changed, and in some cases, the route will be changed slightly.
There will also be dozens of new trains on the tracks.
The transport companies started selling tickets as early as in the autumn.
České dráhy are planning to run an average of 6,783 passenger services per day in the new timetable, including an average of 478 long-distance trains per day.
The trains will cover approximately 118 million kilometres during the new timetable.
In addition to the domestic connections, the new timetable will also include routes to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland.
The company will introduce dozens of new trains along with the new timetable.
The main novelty will be the InterJet trains, which will run on the Prague-Cheb line.
The transport company is sending other new trains to the north of Moravia or in western Bohemia.
The transport company will also traditionally raise ticket prices next year, by an average of 3.2 per cent.
The railways take inflation into account in their tariffs every year.
The biggest change in the RegioJet timetable is the entry into the R23 line Ústí nad Labem - Mělník - Nymburk - Kolín.
The transport company will replace České dráhy here after its success in the Ministry of Transport's competition.
RegioJet will operate a total of 16 trains on the route every day, eight in each direction.
Other changes affect long-distance trains between Prague and Brno, which will stop at Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín from Sunday.
Leo Express retained its 16 connections, two return connections to Slovakia and the weekend connection to Krakow.
According to spokesman Emil Sedlář, the transport company tried to keep the schedules of its long-distance trains as similar as possible despite the planned maintenance work.
Without major changes, the operation of Arriva trains and other carriers should also continue.
Transport providers will also be exchanged on some regional routes.
There will be changes for passengers, for example in the Českolipsko area, where instead of Czech Railways, the Trilex trains of the German company Die Länderbahn will run on the line from Mladá Boleslav via Česká Lípa to Rumburk.
Travellers will also be able to use a single ticket on the railway for the second year in a row.
Just like České dráhy, their prices will increase by 3.2 per cent due to inflation.
I have to disagree.
Aren't we supposed to learn the other side of the story?
Everywhere we hear how much they had to fight for their rights, how they were oppressed and had to work hard and die.
In my life, I've never heard a sermon from the perspective of the slave-owning side or from that time, nobody is defending it, they're just condemning it.
No one tells you in school that black people often sold other black people into slavery and that they were often the worst slave owners.
No one will teach you at school that the colonisers often bought the land from the Indians; they will only tell you how brutally we, the Europeans, exterminated them, although they were killing each other long before us.
I also spent some time in the USA, directly at the schools, both in the north and in the south.
I have not encountered anyone deliberately covering up facts, but I have heard before that it happens, and I think it's a problem (for example, in Japan, the atrocities of WW2 are quite a taboo).
My point is that history is not black and white and that we have a tendency to look at it from today's perspective, without understanding.
History is not interested in people's feelings, it is just what it is, and I think it is a fatal mistake to condemn without looking at things from that time.
On the other hand, we should learn from it and never do this again.
By the way, while we're on the subject of southern states, yes, the Confederate flag and famous slave owners are quite popular there, on the other hand they also had some of their own successes, and it seemed absurd to me to reject them.
Moreover, the North was not much better, as many people idealise it today.
And a lot of people also forget that not everyone in the South were slave owners and a lot of things bothered them too.
I wouldn't compare this to the Russians, they deliberately leave out some facts, lie and manipulate, and our point of view doesn't exist (there was a video on YouTube from a TV channel, where they cut off someone who started talking about our legionnaires and 1968).
What I found funny about US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealization of communism, something their country has never experienced.
Overall, I found that at some universities it was terrible, those students were quite radicalised and the universities often supported them.
And when I think that these people will be much older in the future, I am a little bit worried that this could be the voice of the majority, because it is among the young and even in the ruling elite.
I think that, for example, feminism has already achieved what it set out to and it's no longer about the same thing, it has become radicalised.
Currently, those who have nothing to do with it and ignore the basic biological fact are called feminists, as well as other groups such as LGBT, and this leads to radicalisation even on the other side, where it often leads to resistance even to quite reasonable things.
Furthermore, the more radical someone is, the more likely they are to be heard.
On the other hand, I have not come across anyone who has condemned me for colonialism or slavery.
I encountered more bad geography, but that was a two-way street :D
Not because I don't like it here, but because I think it is completely pointless.
Am I supposed to be proud of something I could not do on my own?
Moreover, I consider the concept of nationality as a whole to be superfluous in terms of personal identity.
If there is anything that binds me to people, it is interests, views of the world and shared experiences, not where we were born.
I am not a believer, but from what I know, I can tell you this: We have two Greek-Catholic parishes here, one is Ukrainian and the other is Slovak.
That Slovak priest is a really nice guy, his sermons are more about theology than politics, but then he always ends up saying something stupid about the coronavirus, that everyone should be ashamed.
Then there is, of course, the Czechoslovak Hussite Church.
They are officially Protestants, but in fact they were born out of the Catholic modernism and are practically Catholics without the pope.
I know a lot of people who are Catholics but go to the services of the Hussites, because it is theologically very similar, but the members are usually more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická street.
The church of St. Michael on the Dominican Square belongs to the Dominicans, and they even do mass in Latin every Sunday at 3 p.m., as it was done before Vatican II.
The Bethlehem flame is in the Czech Republic; the scouts have taken it from Austria
Břeclav – The flame lit in Bethlehem, where, according to Christian tradition, Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
This time, however, the scouts did not go to Vienna due to the coronavirus pandemic; in the morning, they received it from their Austrian colleagues at the Reintal – Břeclav border crossing.
They accepted it at the border last year as well.
The Bethlehem Light is a beautiful Christmas tradition we participate in every year, and I look forward to it very much.
I am honoured to have been chosen, said scout Amálie Budíková to the present journalists.
While last year the handover took place at the Mikulov-Drasenhofen border crossing, directly on the border bridge, this year it took place at the Reintal-Břeclav border crossing in the car park.
However, the scouts usually travel by train to Vienna.
The delivery of the flame across the Czech Republic will not change.
The scouts set off with the Bethlehem light by train to Brno, where they will hand it over to the diocesan bishop Vojtěch Cikrle.
Scout couriers will deliver the light on Saturday, 18 December. They will travel by selected express trains and passenger trains.
The light will then be taken over by the local scouts or volunteers, who will then spread the flame across the Czech Republic, even to places where the trains do not go.
Even this year, scouts must follow the current measures to prevent the spread of the coronavirus.
It is going the same way as last year.
We are recommending that the delivery teams and local event organisers, of course, wear masks, try to keep their distance, be as few as possible, not sing with their colleagues, in short, to behave in a way that is as safe as possible, said the spokesperson for the Bethlehem Light event, Zuzana Hrbková.
The tradition of the Bethlehem Light, which travels through Europe, was born in 1986 in Austria.
The aim is to spread the idea of peace, friendship and peace at the same time as the flame.
For believers, the light of Bethlehem is a symbol of hope, a light that overcomes the darkness.
In the Czech Republic, the scouts and scouts have been taking care of its dissemination for more than 30 years.
The event is organised by hundreds of volunteers, and the flame is therefore also a symbol of selflessness and human solidarity.
All the news, including a list of places where people can get a candle, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I do not have an economic education, so I do not know the basics of economics, which confirm that subsidies are a cancer on the economy, but I do not think that subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
Infrastructure development, ecology (e.g. water retention), healthcare and education will put those funds to good use, I just don't understand why those funds are given to agriculture, industry and companies in general.
As mentioned, it produces a waste product and disrupts the free market and "natural life of the company".
I myself work in a factory where there are a million signs on the corridors saying "xy was funded/co-funded by project xy" and such a company is just artificially kept alive.
This is not support for a company that provides jobs for x people, this is holding back development when this company is hanging on by a thread and taking orders/employees from companies that could grow and be more productive after its demise.
Complete agreement, it's terrible.
Even a person who was born in the internet era can fall for a trick or a trap - especially advertising.
I think that online advertising doesn't affect me, but then I get caught out, that it did affect me - it's just so sophisticated that you can't avoid it.
For this reason, I support the radical voices in the European Parliament who currently want to impose an absolute ban on programmatic (i.e. targeted) advertising...
It's all garbage, said the classic - I would ban the internet.
I have a feeling that this virus has its roots in (but mostly in point 1):
1. "I won't believe something that the majority believes in and makes sense, I'm not a sheep after all, but I'd rather believe something that's less likely, doesn't make much sense, but it's important that I have my own original opinion that I'll say is critical thinking"
2. "I'm not going to believe everything the media says."
3. "I don't trust politicians."
TV has fallen out of love with Christmas films, with just 200 premiering this year
Los Angeles - Movie theaters, TV channels and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries have fallen into the trend of Christmas movies and this year will premiere a record number of more than two hundred of them.
The operator of the IMDb film database did the count.
In recent years, the genre of Christmas family and romantic films has scored with the audience and significantly increased its popularity, so more and more of these films are being produced.
This year, four times as many Christmas films were made as in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database, however, includes only those films that have the word Christmas in their title, so there are actually many more Christmas films.
The movies that people traditionally associate with Christmas have always existed.
In the Czech Republic, this period is associated with fairy tales; worldwide, films such as Home Alone, Love Actually or the classic Christmas story It's a Wonderful Life from 1946 are popular.
The real boom in Christmas movies started in 2009, when the American cable television channel Hallmark came up with a special movie series, recalled the BBC website.
Her Christmas project, called Countdown to Christmas, at the time included four films and was very successful.
This year, this station started to tune its viewers in for Christmas as early as 22 October, and will show a total of 42 Christmas films.
Competitor network Lifetime has 35 new holiday-themed films on its schedule this year, and popular streaming services like Netflix are also contributing to the total.
"In this magical time of year, the story doesn't matter so much, it's just important that there's a lot of Christmas trees in the background and it's snowing," said Brandon Gray, author of the book I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies.
"It's a form of escapism for the audience and a way to feel a little bit of calm for at least two hours in the midst of all of this Christmas madness and the madness of the world we've been living in for the last few years," Gray added.
According to him, for example, Hallmark TV uses the same recipe for its films, which is uniform, but successful.
You have two people who fall in love with each other, but then there is a misunderstanding about half an hour before the end, which is successfully resolved and the two of them kiss.
That's the way it's always been, and as long as all the films look the same and have the same atmosphere, people are going to watch them one after the other, Gray added.
Mazepin had a positive test for COVID-19 and will not take part in the final F1 race.
Only nineteen drivers will take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix in Formula 1.
Nikita Mazepin has tested positive for COVID-19 and will not take part in the final race of the season.
The Haas team will only send one car onto the track.
In the last race of the season, he was aiming for a better finish than his 20th place in qualifying.
Russian Nikita Mazepin from the Haas team, however, will not take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He tested positive for COVID-19.
Only 19 cars will appear on the starting grid, with Mick Schumacher, Mazepin's team-mate, starting from the back of the grid, and Max Verstappen, who is in a direct fight for the title with Lewis Hamilton, starting from the front.
According to Haas, Mazepin is in good shape and does not show any symptoms.
Nikita is physically fine as he was asymptomatic.
She is currently in isolation and will follow the guidance of the relevant public health authorities, with safety being the ultimate priority for all involved," they said in a statement to formula1.com.
Haas won't send a substitute driver to the race, and can't.
The substitute would have to qualify or race in another part of the weekend.
The first racer is not dealing with Covid-19.
At the start of the current season, Kimi Räikkönen had COVID-19, and Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton tested positive last year.
You can also get locked up for this.
And everyone will be stolen from, said the boss.
According to the law, Covid is on the list of infectious diseases.
That is, in the same group as HIV, the plague, yellow fever or typhus.
§ 152 Dissemination of a contagious human disease
(1) Whoever willfully causes or increases the danger of introduction or spread of an infectious disease among people shall be punished by imprisonment for a term of six months to three years, by a fine, or by confiscation of property.
(2) The perpetrator will be sentenced to imprisonment for a term of two to eight years,
(c) breaches an important duty arising from his employment, profession, position or function, or imposed on him by law, or
(d) causing serious injury by such an act.
(3) The perpetrator shall be punished with a prison sentence of three to ten years if, in the act referred to in paragraph 1, he has caused serious bodily harm to at least two persons or death.
(4) The perpetrator will be sentenced to imprisonment for five to twelve years, if the act referred to in paragraph 1 results in the death of at least two people.
Quiz: Why do failing companies often have women in charge, and what your boss must never ask of you
The gender pay gap, i.e. the difference in wages between men and women, has been one of the highest in the EU in the Czech Republic for a long time.
Where are the differences greatest?
And in which age group and in which industry do women earn the least compared to men?
Test your knowledge of the gender pay gap.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: The price tag of the most expensive sweater will amaze you!
It's a bit like a mobile jeweller's, and the creator put half a year's work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but not much experience. Sweaters were never worn much at home," says Liban, who spent 3,000 hours on his creation over the course of six months.
The silk was bought in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France and the 2,000 decorative crystals were provided by Swarowski.
The silver stars were then adorned with 150 diamonds.
"The base is wool and cotton, but the silk adds softness to the sweater," says the creator, who does not recommend washing it.
And it has another trick up its sleeve.
"I'm completely broke, I have to sell the sweater as soon as possible," admits Liban.
If it succeeds, it will set a world record.
The previous most expensive sweater, sold five years ago, cost "only" 720,000 Czech crowns.
It doesn't really matter if the MZ is out of touch with reality - it will have the faulty circuit repaired and replaced with a new one.
The fact is that the departure of FB from Europe would be very helpful to its non-Russian part (which is under the influence of bad luck).
I think it would clean up the social climate quite a lot.
The channels of “Soviet fraternal assistance” to some of our political parties and representatives could also be clarified.
Then the people who vote for them will also have a clearer idea of whose interests they are actually serving.
It's a shame they don't own TikTok, too.
A lot of young people would suddenly, with great surprise, discover that the sun also shines outside...
Trump directly called for the torture of suspects, and he is now reaping what he has sown.
On the situation in the US with the leading African-American reporter.
New cases of police violence are coming to light in the United States, this time during the nationwide protests.
Demonstrations that erupted after a police officer killed an African American, George Floyd, during an arrest have opened a debate on systemic racism, the work of the police and cases of brutality against American minorities.
Lenka Kabrhelová spoke with one of the leading African American journalists, The Atlantic reporter Adam Serwer.
But how would that funding be increased?
The union is shoving money down our throats in the form of subsidies.
If it stops doing that, we will no longer have that money.
I really don't see how stopping the EU from giving us money will cause us to use the money for something else...
You can argue that the money from those grants could be used better, but that is a completely different discussion.
Is it even possible for a pub not to pay tax?
Is it even possible for a pub to cut taxes?
After all, if a piece of meat passes a veterinary inspection, it must be registered somewhere and cannot just disappear, right?
Prazdroj and Jelínek probably do not make special alcohol for the black market.
But I often don't get a receipt or they take it back and throw it away.
The government approved the dispatch of up to 150 soldiers to help Poland.
Surveyors, scouts and drone pilots could be out before Christmas, with the mission approved for six months.
They will help their Polish colleagues protect the border with Belarus and build the planned fence.
Poland has officially requested assistance from NATO states in connection with the months-long actions of the Belarusian regime, which has invited citizens of the Middle East to its territory with a false promise of an easy crossing of the EU border.
British and Estonian soldiers are already operating on Polish territory.
Is the Omicron mutation spreading in South Moravia?
Hygiene is investigating another case of a child from Adamov.
"We currently have another suspected case of this variant in another child from Adam's class, in the reception class.
There is no evidence of direct contact with previous cases from ZŠ Adamov," said Ciupek.
There were six cases in the region this week.
"We are still waiting for official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - this is being conducted by the National Reference Laboratory for Influenza and Non-Influenza Viruses at the State Institute of Public Health in Prague," said the director.
She added that it was two nurses from one department of the University Hospital in Brno and two children of one of them, as well as two 11-year-old pupils from ZŠ Adamov.
There is no connection between the cases in Brno and Adamov.
According to the director, three of them have mild symptoms and four are asymptomatic.
No one with suspicion of Omicron has travelled abroad
None of those listed traveled abroad, nor did anyone in their families, nor did they come into contact with anyone who had been abroad.
None of those mentioned have any connection with the water polo championship, said Ciupek.
Chief hygienist Pavla Svrčinová previously stated that an international water polo tournament held in Brno a few weeks ago was being investigated.
Among them were players from South Africa and one Belgian player who became ill after returning home.
California will restrict gun sales.
It wants to follow Texas's lead on banning abortions.
California Gov. Gavin Newsom on Saturday announced a plan to ban the sale and manufacture of some guns in the nation's most populous state by using the same legal mechanism that Texas used in its controversial abortion law that bans abortions after a fetal heartbeat is detected.
People would then have the right to sue anyone who manufactures or sells assault weapons and homemade guns in California.
Newsom's announcement came in response to a Friday ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court, which left in place a Texas ban on abortions, even though it goes against a nearly 50-year-old precedent that established a right to abortion nationwide up until about 24 weeks of pregnancy.
However, the court was not now ruling on the constitutionality of the entire law, but on a technical issue arising from the innovative construction of the measure.
In this case, enforcement of the ban was delegated to the public, making it impossible for Texas Republicans to challenge it in court.
"I'm outraged by yesterday's (Friday) decision by the United States Supreme Court to uphold the Texas ban on most abortions and to largely endorse Texas's scheme to protect its law," the California governor said.
"If states can now block review of their laws by federal courts, then California will exercise that authority to save lives," Newsom continued.
He reportedly tasked his subordinates to work with the state parliament and the justice minister on measures that would allow representatives of the public to enforce the ban on assault rifles and so-called ghost guns.
These are home-made guns that do not have serial numbers and can be used to circumvent regulations.
Newsom wants to give "private citizens" the right to sue for at least $10,000 (220,000 CZK) and legal fees from anyone who manufactures, distributes or sells assault rifles, "ghost gun" parts or kits to make them in California.
"If the most effective way to keep these deadly weapons off our streets is to create the threat of private litigation, then that's exactly what we should do," the California governor said.
The Associated Press notes that California has banned the manufacture and sale of some military-style weapons for decades, but a federal judge blocked the state's ban in June as unconstitutional.
If the state were to now actually reinstate the ban using the Texas model, it would confirm the words of liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who in a dissenting opinion to Friday's majority ruling warned against expanding the legal mechanism to other states.
However, the Supreme Court did not grant the Texas ban full immunity from judicial review, allowing abortion clinics to continue to sue certain officials in the southern U.S. state.
Each emergency vaccination has a public testing phase, during which the vaccination schedule is gradually worked out, and the vaccines themselves are improved, based on the results.
For example, large studies on the effects of the 4th dose are already rolling out in Israel.
And according to these studies, in most patients there is a fivefold increase in antibodies, which already has the long-term effect mentioned by you.
Just like any other vaccination, it will have its own vaccination schedule, but it is too early for that.
Another fact is that a new vaccine, based on inactivated virus, is expected to hit the market soon. According to the manufacturer's specifications, it promises up to 10 times greater effectiveness.
Leave the amount of material as it is.
But to re-think what is being taught.
Since the days of Maria Theresa our civilisation and technology have advanced a little and learning telephone numbers and copying textbooks into notebooks doesn't make much sense and is a waste of time.
They should really cut back on these things.
On the other hand, how many people leave school with some basic financial literacy?
And what else will he need to survive?
How can I legally watch the Champions League online?
Do you know if there is an online service here in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
At home I have a Netbox and I pay for the Telly sports package for the Spanish and English football leagues.
But it does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think that O2 offers the Champions League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatens to block EU budget payments
According to Ziobro, the European Commission would be acting against the law if it used its new powers and stopped the payment of money to Poland because of the dispute over the rule of law.
The Commission has already delayed approval of Poland's plan to tap 36 billion euros from the EU's recovery fund to revive economies hit by the COVID-19 pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to move forward and use a mechanism to withdraw EU funding from countries that break the rule-of-law principles.
"Poland should respond to this blackmail from the EU with a veto on all matters that require unanimity," said Ziobro, leader of the small Solidary Poland party, without whose votes the current government would lose its narrow majority in the Sejm.
"Poland should also consider its commitments to EU energy and climate policies, which have led to a drastic increase in energy prices," added Ziobro.
If the dispute continues, I will demand that Poland stops its contributions to the EU.
This would be justified given that the EU is illegally withholding funds from the common budget to which we also contribute, added the Polish minister.
His party holds more radical views on the EU than the ruling Law and Justice party.
According to the European Commission, the changes to the Polish justice system during Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians.
According to Ziobro, Brussels is setting "impossible conditions, because its goal is not the rule of law, but changing the government in Poland."
Warsaw is facing a "political dictatorship carried out through extortion and an attempt to undermine the democratic decision of millions of Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said that Poland should be a member of such an EU which is based on the partnership of sovereign states and not on the rule of the strongest and the Brussels bureaucracy which is not under democratic control.
He said his party would never agree to any concessions from Brussels that would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to Poland having the status of a colony," he said.
But to get to grips with it... Here in Lidl, they have one type of cheese in four different places.
I didn't look at anything else, I met one yogurt more than once, I just needed cheese, Parmesan, after ten minutes at the dairy section I gave up and asked.
They had it, that's true, in that narrow section there were all the chosen, less common and special cheeses, but it was between the vegetables and the lactose-free zone...
If I avoid it, I won't even smell a market, action or no action, the golden shop on the square doesn't have such a wide selection, but they usually have everything I need, and it's all in order, so I'm done in ten minutes.
I went to Lidl to buy my holiday.
And I don't care anymore.
I've been watching for two years as data is treated here like manure, and most anti-vaxxers are just a little more out of touch than most pro-vaxxers.
A rational debate is taking place at a professional level, but only extreme opinions are getting through to the public.
It's always from wall to wall.
Binary thinking: The vaccine will save us, the vaccine is useless.
Ban everything, allow everything.
Colourful pastries instead of robust analysis.
Apples and oranges comparison.
This state does it this way and we do it this way.
But no one is discussing the fact that the data collection methodology is different in the two states.
Phew, I'm relieved.
I'm sorry for the outburst and I wish you all a nice day.
I was punished with a rolling pin as a child.
It was never about the marks, it was usually just that I repeatedly refused to listen and misbehaved (read instead of going to bed, argued with my brother, etc).
At the same time, I have never been punished without a warning. My mother always first threatened that if I did it again, I would get a slap (sometimes even after another "scolding" with a spoon, she would only bring it and place it so that I could see it).
Only after repeatedly refusing to listen did I get a couple of slaps on the back (through my clothing).
Personally, I think that physical punishment (in a reasonable manner and degree) is beneficial, because the child reacts to it much more than to words.
I think the important part is the warning, because it gives the child a choice whether to disobey and get a punishment, or to improve and not get a punishment.
I usually only needed a warning before I started to listen.
Defence of the system
When prominent Czech lawyer and constitutional court judge Vojtěch Cepl answered a journalist's question in 1999 as to what the Czech constitution meant to him - whether it was a sacred document to which one swears an oath and about which one is taught in school from a young age, or, on the contrary, an agreement that can be changed if necessary - he definitely inclined towards the first interpretation.
We once agreed on the democratic rules of our life, which at the same time define who we are as a state and its citizens, and changes are better saved.
And imagine this: some nations even like their rules.
Just as Czechs like dumplings with pork and cabbage, said Vojtěch Cepl at the time.
However, in recent times, there has been an increasing number of opinions among lawyers that the Czech Constitution needs to be changed.
Over the years, it has been tested by situations that its creators (including Vojtěch Cepl) could not foresee, such as the behaviour of the directly elected president.
But there was one thing that Cepl was right about.
Everything we know about such documents suggests that political interference in their wording must be deliberate.
Institutions must be understood and actively protected, only then can they be the key to dealing with most of the crises that societies have faced throughout history.
A constitution is, among other things, a set of rules of governance that sets the limits of the game for politicians.
We fear that power will be abused against minorities or individuals, so we tie the hands of politicians with restrictions.
At the same time, the constitutional texts also allow politicians to abuse their power.
Covid doesn't discriminate: several-month-old baby fighting for life at Brno University Hospital
Although it is known that the coronavirus is generally milder in children, there are also severe cases, which hospitals are mainly dealing with in recent times.
"We know that children are at less risk than adults, there is talk of 2 to 5 per cent compared to adults," said the head of the Pediatric Anesthesiology and Resuscitation Clinic at the University Hospital in Brno and the Faculty of Medicine at Masaryk University, Petr Dominik, to Novinky.cz.
The course is usually much less severe, lighter, and often symptom-free.
However, there are child patients who are severely ill with the coronavirus, which we are seeing particularly in recent times," added Dominik.
According to the doctor, it is about dozens of children who need mild supportive care.
It takes place at the Children's Infectious Diseases Clinic.
Children who are very seriously ill with the coronavirus have only recently been admitted to the ICU.
According to the doctor, children with post-COVID syndromes were admitted to the ward continuously throughout the year.
"Now there's an increase in kids with acute COVID pneumonia, that means inflammation of the lung that requires admission to the intensive care unit," he said, adding that the illness affects not only adults but also adolescents and babies as young as a few months old.
There are also children in critical condition due to COVID-19 in hospitals.
"We currently have a child of several months of age and an adolescent here," said the head of the department.
She is happy, however, that the children's hospital at the Brno University Hospital has not yet recorded any child deaths due to the coronavirus.
According to available data, six children aged 0-14 died in the Czech Republic on December 6.
According to Dominik, a psychologist is an essential part of the team in a children's hospital - not just in the COVID-19 ward.
At the same time, it also points out that just like in adults, vaccination also reduces the severity of the disease and at the same time reduces the occurrence of post-COVID syndrome in children.
"That's why we recommend the application of the vaccine dose in children as well," added the doctor.
You can only walk on marked paths in the quiet zone.
But those quiet zones aren't that big.
They can be seen on the tourist map on maps.cz.
Generally speaking, in national parks outside the quiet zone, you can walk anywhere (but don't climb over the fence into the enclosure).
Skiing/cycling in the forest outside marked paths is not allowed anywhere, unless you have an exemption (but it is not really enforced in national parks).
How does a conductor train?
The music is playing in my head, smiles Josef Kurfiřt.
He was brought up on the Liberec Opera and originally played the horn.
As a singer, he can sing practically any repertoire, and as a conductor, he works not only at the F. Šaldy Theatre in Liberec, but also, for example, in Pilsen at the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
He collaborates with the Hradec Králové Philharmonic, the Film Philharmonic or the Podkrkonoší Symphony Orchestra.
China is building a narrative of control over the outbreak and that an authoritarian regime is better equipped to deal with a crisis
Sinologist Jirouš: China is building an impression that it has overcome the epidemic and that the authoritarian regime is dealing with the crisis better.
China launched a medical and political offensive.
A few months ago, Beijing was deflecting criticism for failing to contain an outbreak that turned into a global pandemic.
Now the country is reporting zero new infections.
Countries including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective equipment and Chinese doctors are helping in the fight against the coronavirus, for example, in the worst-affected Italy.
How to interpret Beijing's willingness?
Is it friendly support or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
He meets a friend of a friend and says to him: "Hey, do you want an elephant?"
I have it, and it's great.
The wife is pleased because it mows the lawn, washes the car, and the children play with it.
It's just great.
If you want to pay 5000,- I'll sell you an elephant.
Friend: Yeah, I'll pay for it, it'll be great...
After some time, they meet again and the one who bought complains: "You bastards, what did you sell the elephant for????"
The lawn has been trampled, there are huge piles of manure everywhere, the car is broken, the children are afraid of it and the wife wants a divorce.
The one who sold it says: You can't sell an elephant like that...
World affairs are dominated by great powers.
Despite the equality of sovereign states, it is the great powers that determine the course of international affairs.
Europe can become a superpower only if it works on its integration.
It currently operates on an economic and political level (in selected issues), but military integration is still lacking.
Personally, I think Europe is heading towards federalisation.
It won't be 10, 15 or 20 years.
But in the middle of the century, the mood will be different, and it will work out.
It also occurred to me, and it is quite possible.
I'm not an expert in Czech, so I may be wordy.
I'm just going by the fact that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units on the same level.
I'll borrow an example from another comment "Spanish oranges and mandarins", where it's clear that both are from Spain, whereas with "Spanish fruit and mandarins" it's not clear that the mandarins are from Spain.
Plus, I'm basing it on the fact that the sentence reads "all American forces," which includes their weapons, and I know that American complexes are only operated by Americans.
In other words, I expect that it is already included in that broad term and there is no need to further specify it for American forces.
But again, I'm just being a word nerd :D
Either way, it's a ridiculous request
A 5-magnitude earthquake has been recorded in Tokyo.
The Japanese capital Tokyo and surrounding areas were hit by a 5.0 magnitude earthquake on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings shook in the capital, but there were no reports of damage.
A tsunami warning was not issued, Reuters reported.
Vicki Holland of the UK tortured the capuchin monkey Milly
Horrific footage shows the moment a terrified monkey cowered in a toilet bowl before her heartless owner flushed her down and laughed at her.
Holland fed the monkey hot dogs, kebabs, and hamburgers, regardless of its actual nutritional needs.
Magistrates in Gwent have now banned her for life from keeping animals, The Sun reports.
The primate rehabilitation experts caring for Milly after her ordeal have said they have never seen a spaceman so scared.
Milly spent almost two years in rehabilitation at Monkey World in Dorset and is now happily playing with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The mother-of-four admitted two charges of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was sentenced to a 12-week prison sentence, suspended for one year, at Gwent Magistrates' Court.
Holland was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid community service, banned for life from keeping animals, and must pay 12,000 Czech crowns in court costs.
Steph Sawyer, who led the Small Monkeys team that rehabilitated the abused animal, said: "Milly is doing well but her rehabilitation will continue."
Milly took a while to get used to people again.
She cowered and hid from anyone she encountered and any loud noise or sudden movement caused her to scream.
The monkey refused to eat for a long time.
Even now, when she's settled and happy with her mate, the sight of new people can still cause her to panic.
The mental scars of the abuse will stay with her forever, says Sawyer.
The abuse of Millie came to light after police in Gwent found the disturbing footage on the woman's phone when they raided her home over drugs allegations.
In the footage, Milly can be heard using vulgar language.
In another video, Ms. Holland is heard offering the monkey cocaine, saying, "Do you want the cocaine?"
So lick my fingers.
In May, she and her partner Russell Cox, 43, pleaded guilty to possession of cocaine with intent to supply.
Her home was found to contain cocaine worth £1,600 (around 50,000 Czech crowns) hidden in Kinder eggs.
Cox was sentenced to 30 months in prison and Holland received a 20-month suspended sentence.
And what amazing concepts do you learn from that prehistoric period three times in a row when you bravely jump over the whole 20th century?
As if you take the same things with you in the first year as in the sixth grade?
And the whole thing is killing the idea of bifling, where no one, with the exception of a few people, is interested in whether you can do it or understand it.
The main thing is to write the test on 1 and then no one cares.
Go out on the street and ask random people if they can solve for the roots of a quadratic equation and the coefficients.
Everyone goes through it, and the vast majority don't even scratch and will tell you they couldn't care less.
So what the hell are they learning?
I'm a big fan of the general survey and the fact is that people don't want it and don't need it.
And at that point it's futile and you're never going to get it in anyway.
Some of it is taught for the sake of the many people who will need it.
But the note that you don't need all of this when you're standing by the machine, I meant absolutely seriously... ...because you don't need it.
Plus, we're slowly getting to a time where not knowing is a punk thing to do.
(Which is probably due to our communist past and our dislike of intellectuals and elites) However, the price of having barbarians standing at those machines is just too high.
If only the journalists could count, COVID-19 probably wouldn't have reached these proportions.
Wedding at first sight: The war between Kadri and Andrea continues!
Which is the main reason why Switzerland can't leave right away," replied Andrea on Instagram in Stories to general questions from curious fans who wanted to know what had disappointed her so much about Kadri that she decided to end all contact and even block him on social media.
From the start of the experiment, there has been friction between Kadri and Andrea.
The main problem was the fact that Kadri lived and worked in Switzerland, and his idea was that Andrea would move to him, at least until he returned to the Czech Republic for good.
However, she resolutely refused.
As it turns out, their relationship didn't end in love, but rather in mutual disrespect and hatred.
It was your planned attack! retorted Kadri in response to Andrei's accusations of lies, gambling and debts.
Kadri's supposed honesty now doesn't sit well with his ex-wife or his younger sister Linda.
She decided to publicly stand up for her brother.
Normally, I don't talk about these things at all, and we never really talked about these things in the family.
I definitely don't want to elicit any pity.
But when I see someone trying to publicly hurt and smear the name of someone I love so much, I just can't take it!
I'm sorry that I have to do this the hard way, but I would like to publicly thank my brother Kadri for making a character out of himself and helping our family when we needed it the most, even though he was so young.
It's all the more frustrating when I have to read such untrue information, which is probably taken out of context.
I wish everyone could know Kadri the way I do, our loved ones and family said in a statement in response to Andrey's words.
I am so grateful to him for everything!
Of course people are going to believe what they read, but the most important thing is that we, his family, love him more than anything and we know the truth and we know what really happened, she added vaguely.
The drunk thief climbed up the facade to the fifth floor.
You wouldn't believe why.
Chao started his crime spree in a residential area, where he tried to break into several cars in a parking lot.
According to available information, he ultimately stole less than 330 crowns from one vehicle.
He then had no better idea than to climb to the fifth floor and enter the apartment through an open window.
There, he stole two bananas.
In footage from one of the security cameras, he can then be seen walking down the street away from the scene of the crime, eating a banana.
When the apartment owner woke up in the morning, he realized the bananas were not where they were and called the police.
She then detained Chaa.
The man admitted that he drank some alcohol on the day in question.
Since he needed money, he decided to rob while drunk.
The whole matter is still under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the fifth floor, where he stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and is effective only during a pandemic emergency.
When this is repealed, the law will no longer be in effect.
The law limits the scope of business
Is that not enough of a reason for you?
The right to gather will be limited, but not abolished.
More than 60% of voters turned out for Saturday's elections to four municipalities
On Saturday, people elected new councils in the villages of Komňa in Uherskohradišťsko, Lužice in Mostecko, Nová Ves in Liberecko, and in Rovné in Pelhřimovsko.
The number of councillors in these places has fallen below the number required by law, or the elected council has broken up.
A total of 99 candidates competed for the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest of them is 69 years old, the youngest is 33 years old.
Processing the results of Saturday's election symbolically marks the end of a fairly challenging, but successful year for us.
There were a total of four new or repeated elections to municipal councils and, above all, very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies, said deputy head of the Czech Statistical Office Eva Krumpová.
She recalled that the elections were more demanding in terms of equipment and personnel due to the COVID-19 epidemic.
In Komňa in Uherské Hradiště, the Association of Independent Candidates won Saturday's election, receiving 27.76 percent of the vote and two seats in the seven-member council.
The STAN candidate received 24.84% of the votes, which also means two mandates.
Two seats in the council were won by Občané pro Komňu, who got 18.52 per cent of the vote.
Jana Křižková, the previous mayor of the village, who is a member of Soukromníci, was also re-elected to the council.
The Komňans, independent candidates, won one seat on the council.
75.48% of eligible voters went to the polling stations.
In the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov, the Pro Rovnou association won.
It received 50.50 percent of the vote, which means four seats out of seven.
Two more representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 made it into the town council.
Turnout was 93.62 percent.
The Lužice and Svinčice Association, led by Mayor Jindřich John, won the repeated elections in Lužice on Mostecko.
It received 56.73 percent of the vote and, like in 2018, has four seats in the seven-member council.
The second-placed candidate of Obec pro lid, which received 43.27 percent of the vote, will have three representatives in the council.
76.7 percent of voters came to the ballot boxes.
Independent candidates Naděje pro Novou Ves won the elections in Nová Ves in the Liberec region, ahead of the ANO movement.
The Association of Independent Candidates received 59.88% of the vote, winning four of the seven seats on the town council.
The ANO received 40.12% of the vote and compared to the regular elections in 2018 it strengthened its position, gained one more mandate and now has three.
Turnout was 42.9 percent of voters.
The State Election Commission will discuss the election results on Monday.
They will then be published in the Collection of Laws.
What do you think is the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign politician?
I think you know all this stuff that people are writing here.
You're just playing the fool so that you have someone to "argue" with.
If not, it's sad.
I'm not saying that Christians are degenerates, or anything like that.
I even like a lot of church buildings for aesthetic reasons (which was, after all, the point of making them look good).
And I don't care who believes in what.
On the other hand, I don't like how much power the Church had in the Middle Ages, how much money it made, the suppression of science, etc.
Not to mention all the wars it has caused, such as the Thirty Years' War
TL;DR: Believe in the spaghetti monster if you want, but the state and the church have nothing to do with each other
The man fell head-first from 12 metres.
He survived the impact with the concrete.
An incredible fall was survived on Sunday night by a man in Ostrava, who was attended to by rescuers from the Moravian-Silesian Regional Emergency Medical Service.
The county's 911 dispatch center received the emergency call with initial information about the man's fall about an hour after midnight on Saturday.
Two ZZS crews were immediately dispatched to the scene - a medical team and a paramedic team.
When medics arrived at the scene, they discovered the 27-year-old man had fallen from a window from a height of about 12 metres and landed on his head on concrete!
Coal was caught in Vítkovice.
But not as it should be, and the firefighters went into action.
On the arrival of emergency services, the man was unconscious, with multiple injuries and in a life-threatening condition.
The attending physician intubated his airway, provided artificial lung ventilation, and, following further measures as part of pre-hospital emergency care, the ambulance transported him to further care at the Ostrava Trauma Centre, informed the spokesperson for the ZZS MS region, Lukáš Humpl.
I am more worried about the inappropriate reactions of the public and the authorities than I am about the coronavirus
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic is a challenge for politicians and officials, but doctors and medical staff are at the forefront of the battle against the infection.
How serious is the situation from their point of view?
We ask the military doctor David Řezáč.
Editor: Matěj Válek, Research: Tomáš Roček, Sound: David Kaiser, Music: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes falls after seven years, Oliveira defends the belt
The MMA had a great gala evening full of interesting results.
Things were happening at UFC 269.
The outsider Julianna Peña was able to defeat the legendary fighter Amanda Nunes, who had not lost for seven years.
Charles Oliveira did not hesitate in the lightweight division, presented a great choke against Dustin Poirier and defended the belt.
There was also a win for Kai Kara-France, who swept aside Cody Garbrandt with a technical knockout in the first round.
He also defeated Sean O'Malley.
A surprise that no one was expecting.
The women's bantamweight bout between the legendary Amanda Nunes and Julianna Peña headlined the event.
The American entered the fight as a kind of "dwarf", because Nunes had not lost for seven years and was looking for another triumph.
The start of the duel was also in line with the paper expectations.
Nunes started the fight off very aggressively, landing a push kick that sent her opponent to the ground.
However, Peňová did not allow herself to make another mistake, and herself tried unsuccessfully to attack with a hook to the hand.
The second round was gripping and very tense for MMA fans.
The two rivals traded a flurry of excellent punches and hard hooks.
In addition, Peňa threw Nunes to the ground, where she began to strangle her.
She had to give up her efforts and fend off the attack.
The American prepared a huge shock for everyone when she became the new champion.
The main event was a lightweight title bout between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier.
At first, Poirier had the better of the exchanges, but gradually the tide began to turn.
In the second round, Oliveira tried to be more active, and tried to take his opponent down with an arm lock.
He did not have much success with that, but then he built up a lot of pressure, got his opponent on his back and showered him with a series of blows.
Thanks to this, he won the second round.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to tap out.
The Brazilian defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next match, Sean O'Malley recorded a sovereign triumph, putting Raulian Paiva down in the first round with a hard right to the back.
He then finished him off with a series of precise blows to record his 15th triumph.
Kara-France then beat Cody Garbrandt.
Nunes celebrated another triumph with her little daughter in the spring, now, seven years later, she has lost.
That hip or that hip?
At first glance, it doesn't seem like anything complicated.
Most nouns in Czech express only one grammatical gender, so there is no problem in determining whether it is masculine, feminine or neuter.
There is also a fairly large group of nouns whose gender is not fixed.
Such substantives oscillate between two genders.
When declined, they take on double endings and in some cases remain in the uninflected form.
For example, the words "svizel" and "kyčel" are of both masculine and feminine gender, in the first case they are inflected according to the "machine" paradigm, in the second case according to the "song" paradigm.
Another group of nouns have different forms in the first singular case, for example: "řádek/řádka", "kedluben/kedlubna" or "brambor/brambora" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are grammatically correct, have the same meaning, and are therefore freely interchangeable.
Some words vary regionally, for example "okurka" in Bohemia and "okurek" in Moravia, but in this case, the Moravian variant is non-standard, as are other Czech-Moravian pairs of words: "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih", etc.
Some words that entered Czech from other languages were originally uninflected, but are gradually taking on Czech endings.
A typical example is the word "image", which is both masculine and feminine, or the word "buffet", which has remained in the middle gender, but in the masculine it has endings according to the model "castle".
Turkey has opened the way for migrants to Europe.
What is the situation like at the Greek border?
Tensions are high along the Greek-Turkish border as an increasing number of migrants try to make their way further into Europe.
Thousands of people have been heading towards the southern edge of the Schengen area after Ankara stopped holding them back.
European politicians are promising Greece support, and the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What actually motivates refugees to take this perilous journey?
And what is the situation on the ground?
Three months without a blue sky and we're suffocating, says Sydney journalist
The devastating fires that have been plaguing Australia for four months have killed almost 30 people and hundreds of millions of animals, and have destroyed millions of acres of land.
How are the local authorities and the residents themselves dealing with the disaster?
Could the Morrison government have done more to prevent the drastic impact, critics say?
And what will the country have to prepare for in the future in relation to climate change?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks with journalist Ika Detrichová from Sydney.
False accusations are always and have always been relatively rare.
That's why they always write about him everywhere.
It's uncomfortable for people to talk about how sexual violence looks in our society and how pervasive it is, so they try to sweep it under the rug.
I don't personally know anybody who has been falsely accused.
I know a lot of people who have been raped, and I have seen how the people around them, and even the police, often treat them.
Victims should always be believed.
It has become a trend for victims to finally open up about their trauma.
However, too many people are still keeping it to themselves.
Yes, there are those who make false accusations.
It's disgusting and spitting in the face of all victims of sexual violence, but by spreading the idea that "a lot of the accusations are false" and that it's a "trend" you're only helping sexual predators.
Scattered houses flood the Czech Republic, families have no money to finish them
Prices for building materials have risen by more than 30 per cent in recent weeks and months.
Many people have found themselves in a difficult situation because of this.
She does not have the means to complete the family homes she has already built, and the banks are refusing to increase her mortgage loans.
In addition to the price of materials, the price of construction work is also increasing.
People therefore do not have enough money to finish the family homes that have already been laid out.
In many cases, banks refuse to increase mortgage loans, which creates extremely unpleasant situations.
In the best case, people move into makeshift and unlicenced houses.
In the worst case scenario, the scattered houses are uninhabitable, and families are forced to sell them because they cannot afford to pay off the mortgage and rent at the same time," says BHS economist Štěpán Křeček.
We build two to three family homes a year, and fifty percent of the time it happens to us.
For us, as a construction company, it is difficult, because we have to comply with some of the contractual obligations, even though the materials have become more expensive.
So we're doing it for free," said Zdeněk Slivoň, the owner of a construction company.
There are a lot of people who are going to have financial problems.
If they were counting on it costing five million to build the house, now it will cost seven.
I think some will wait," added Slivoň.
Copper, iron and also plumbing and heating equipment were the most expensive items.
Construction firms are also struggling with a shortage of labour.
In the Czech Republic, there is a lack of graduates in construction-related fields, and the influx of foreign workers is being slowed by the pandemic.
The situation is currently more favourable with regard to the issuing of building permits.
"The building authorities issued 7,675 building permits in October, which is almost 10 percent more than a year ago," said Křeček.
We are doing well, and we will do even better.
Real visions are missing, says a Czech Radio – mujRozhlas commentator
In addition to the traditional New Year's celebrations, the start of the new year has also traditionally been accompanied by speeches by politicians.
This year, in addition to the Prime Minister and ANO leader Andrej Babiš and the Christmas message from President Miloš Zeman, the presidents of the Senate and the Chamber of Deputies also spoke to the nation.
What did we learn?
In my opinion, the master's thesis is great, I have my own topic, which I have chosen, I am building on my bachelor's thesis, I work on it for a whole year and then, in a week or two, I write the written part.
The state exams here are completely calm, if you are not a total monkey and something is left in your head, the commission will not unnecessarily suffocate you with the theory.
For example, I studied for the state exams for a week, and when I was exhausted, the commission always tried to lead me to some logical deduction, which I immediately understood, and I was right.
Otherwise, to those projects, I know people who pay someone to do their semester project for them (we did it a lot, it's really useful, you learn a lot), and then they just learn the project and they're done.
In my opinion, it's great when there's a test at the end of the course that reflects the knowledge gained during the project, not just a defence.
All well and good, but don't clog up e-mail and phone lines and don't send any packages to the embassy.
You will be just like them.
Those people at the embassy may have nothing to do with it.
And if they were against Russia, they would risk a lot, so maybe they have to play with them, because otherwise something could happen to them.
But you could easily put a statue of Putin next to the statue of Pú the bear.
Even if you give it to Xi Jinping in the ass, or something like that.
I agree, even though Insta is throwing artists under the bus.
If you don't post stories every day and a new picture at least every second day, your reach will decrease to the absolute minimum.
In addition, it keeps changing which function is more important, whether it is a like, a comment or a save.
I'm really fed up with it recently, so maybe I'll have to go down to TikTok, where a lot of artists from my industry are having success and don't care about it at all.
I'd even be happy if something more user-friendly came along that didn't suck all the creativity and energy out of artists.
Statement of the Donetsk Workers' Party
The Union - yes, the break-up - no, is the opinion of the opponents of the break-up of the USSR as expressed in the picture.
Thirty years since the illegal break-up of the USSR.
On 8 December 1991, the greatest geopolitical disaster in human history took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk, and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the referendum on March 17, 1991, with the open tolerance of Mikhail S. Gorbachev, secretly, without regard for the people, signed an agreement that “the USSR as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality ceases to exist”.
With one stroke of a pen, they "abolished" a country with almost 300 million inhabitants.
With the collapse of the USSR, tens of millions of ethnic Russian citizens found themselves abroad.
Since the start of the 1990s, the population of Russia has decreased by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the non-Russian population of the former Soviet republics, we have lost more people than in both World Wars combined!
Even earlier, the same people who, in one sitting in the Belovezhskaya Pushcha, destroyed what had been built over the previous seventy years, betrayed the socialist camp (created at the cost of millions of lives in the Second World War and in the Great Patriotic War).
They deliberately de-industrialised, slowed down agriculture, and detached fourteen republics that were previously economically connected into a single mechanism from the largest world power.
If we look even deeper, we see the impoverishment of the population, the collapse of the economy, science, the military, the rise of crime, inter-ethnic conflicts, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, a series of orange revolutions, the expansion of NATO to the east, the war and the collapse of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria - all of this is the result of a geopolitical capitulation, the first surrender of the socialist camp and then the Soviet Union.
There is a term in political science called "power vacuum".
All that was rushed to betray and abandon was quickly filled and taken by the NATO countries that accepted our geopolitical surrender.
And the whole world is still shaken by events at the end of the 1980s and the beginning of the 1990s.
The price of a product sold in a large-turnover supermarket may not directly correspond to its quality and quality.
It's Monday and we have some meat in the supermarket that costs 189 CZK/kg.
I'm going to buy it, put it in the fridge, and make it for dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality, where I don't buy the meat on Monday, the chain will lower the price to 99 CZK/kg on Tuesday - describe to me the mechanism by which, by changing its price, the meat becomes a burden on my digestive system?
Or should I wait until Thursday and then the meat will be sold for 69 CZK/kg, one day before the expiry date - how would that meat differ from the meat that I bought on Monday for 120 CZK more and left in my fridge for three days?
I'll answer myself - with nothing.
These statements about the fact that if something is cheap, it must be bad, rotten or of poor quality are so retarded, to tell you the truth ;-)
Recently, I went to Hlavas in Brno and in the underpass, a lady was handing out some kind of brochure. I always take such things with me to help the brigadiers, they can't throw them away...
No, the pamphlet was full of common sense and conservative views on how the world works, but there was nothing about God, I was confused, but I knew it would be some kind of agitprop.
After reading it, I found out who published it and it turned out to be scientology.
No, it was a good matroš, full of completely unnecessary advice, like I should wash myself and not be a pičus.
It's a waste of paper, because forests wouldn't have to be cut down for this.
I had a similar experience with an ex-girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will force you to do things for that person because you love them without realizing how much of a mess the situation is.
She threatened to hurt me because I went out to chat with a friend she didn't like.
Or when I wanted to leave her apartment earlier, she burst into tears and pleaded on her knees for me not to leave.
She then started physically blocking the doors.
For about a year, it was a great relationship, but then another six months went by and it started to beat her up.
After that, I ended the relationship with her by telling her that I was breaking up with her, but that we could talk about it next week to calm her down and to make sure she didn't go crazy again.
Such a person will drain you of your feelings, emotions and general happiness.
Better to keep your distance
When insurance companies are frantically buying up clouds of tests and chasing after positives who wouldn't even know they had the terrible disease if it weren't for the test.
The only thing we achieve is to complicate things for companies, transport companies and others, because their employees were sentenced to five days of home detention by the random number generator.
In the west, they have stopped with the nonsense and recognised that it is pointless to deal with a disease weaker than the famous flu.
Unfortunately, Válek is new and has to steal something and boost his ego by making things up.
I see that the old familiar scoundrel is returning to us.
After years of decline and suppression of this illegal business, MLM recruiting is back in the limelight.
I was one of the recruits, I tried it (I was 20 years old, first year at university), the initial promises of product training and business skills quickly turned into "you don't need to care about that, just get people on board".
I was genuinely interested in the products I was selling, as I wanted to help people, but the training was more about how to scare and talk people into buying.
When the first money came in, you quickly realized that if you wanted to make money, you had to sell a few sure things a month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only profitable, so you felt like a door-to-door crockery salesman.
What I can say, however, is that it was a valuable experience, and I learned that you shouldn't jump on every rumour and that information should be thoroughly verified.
At the same time, I wouldn't put them all in the same bag.
There are people in this business who are successful and even beneficial to people, but they certainly won't be bragging about expensive consumer goods or a "fat" bank account.
I haven't experienced much of this in the company I work for.
HR is calm, the managers are looking after their management and they don't stick their noses into our business.
Regular assessment does take place, in the form of how it is done here (set yourself some goals for the next year, in a year's time we'll see what worked and what didn't) - it's more of a self-assessment than someone judging you by numbers, and so on.
Company outings are also optional.
But we're a bit unique even within our company - there are departments that are more "corporate".
Sometimes it feels like we're a quasi-startup squatting in the offices of a big corporation.
But it doesn't bother us too much as long as the results are there.
The Czech woman missing in Britain is dead.
Her body was found in London.
British police have been searching for the missing 32-year-old Czech woman without success for almost ten days since she went missing at the end of November.
On Sunday 12 December, the former Minister of Foreign Affairs, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that the woman from Uherské Hradiště had been found dead.
The British police unfortunately confirmed to our embassy in London this afternoon that they had found the body of the missing Czech citizen.
The cause of death is under investigation.
Due to the family, we will not be releasing any further information on the case.
Our sincere condolences, wrote Kulhánek on Twitter.
The young woman was last seen on November 28 in a bus on her way home from work, and had withdrawn money from an ATM before getting on the bus.
Her disappearance was reported by co-workers five days later.
She was then reported missing to London police, and Interpol added her to its worldwide list of missing persons.
It also appeared in the Czech database of missing persons.
Police arrested one man in connection with the incident a few days ago.
The role he played in the case and what he is suspected of has not been revealed.
At the end of the year, four municipalities have new councils
On Saturday 11 December, new councils were elected in the municipalities of Komňa in Uherskohradišť district, Lužice in Most district, Nová Ves in Liberec district and Rovná in Pelhřimov district.
The number of representatives in these municipalities has fallen below the number set by law, or the elected councils have collapsed.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates competed for the 28 seats.
Turnout was 62.41%.
The highest turnout was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62% of eligible voters voted.
Eight women and 20 men received mandates.
The average age of the elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69 years old, the youngest 33 years old.
A total of 13 candidate lists have been registered for the new elections to the councils of the aforementioned four municipalities.
36 women and 63 men competed for 28 council seats.
The average age of candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22, the oldest 72.
The processing of Saturday's election results for us symbolically closes a relatively demanding, but successful year.
It saw the holding of four new or repeated elections to municipal councils and, above all, the closely-watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies.
We had to work in more difficult epidemic conditions, which put greater demands on the equipment and personnel, said Eva Krumpová, Deputy Chairwoman of the Czech Statistical Office.
The final polling district was processed at 03:49 on Sunday 12 December.
The State Election Commission will discuss the results on Monday and after approval, they will be published in the Collection of Laws.
This is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
It took me a while to get used to the fact that we have a very dangerous infectious disease here, but it went without any major problems.
What I still have a problem with is the fact that a large part of the population in all its layers treat it in an idiotic way.
I'm most looking forward to the vaccination (tomorrow!) because thanks to it, I'll finally be less dependent on the fact that other people aren't assholes.
He would be removed from office and ineligible to hold it again.
However, as others have mentioned, the chances of this actually happening are very small.
In addition, I am not sure whether the filing of the case could be considered treason.
Treason is such an act by which the president endangers the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or the democratic character of the state.
It had to be something more serious.
How the pandemic affected intimate life: The number of people up to the age of 35 who are without sex for a whole year is growing
An increasing number of young adults in the U.S. are living their lives without sex.
It is mainly religious people, says the DailyMail website.
The survey showed that from 2008 to 2021, the share of people under 35 who are abstaining from sex increased from eight to 21 per cent.
The number of women aged 18 to 35 who said they had not had sex in the past year was higher than ever.
Other factors also contribute to the decline in sexual activity, a survey by the Institute for Family Studies (IFS) showed.
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus pandemic and the higher unemployment rate.
But the presence of the media, social media and video games, which make sex less of a priority for young people, may also have played a part.
"Since 2010, there's been a rapid rise in the share of men and women aged 18 to 35 who say they had no sex in the past year," IFS researcher Lyman Stone said.
People in relationships are more likely to be sexually active, with just 5% of them saying they went a year without sex in 2021.
Among the unmarried it was 29 per cent. Stone added that marriage under the age of 35 is only a small percentage.
The decline in sexual activity is also due to the fear of pre-marital sex and religious upbringing.
Although married couples are more likely to be sexually active, the percentage of married and cohabiting younger than 35 is still falling.
Young people are divided on the issue of premarital sex, with about 30% thinking it is wrong and about 70% thinking it is okay.
"It's true that they're a minority among single people in this age group, but their behaviour is shifting the trend," Stone says of the 30 per cent.
For most of those who have a moral problem with premarital sex, the reason is religious.
Since 2008, the proportion of free-thinkers aged under 35 who are abstinent has risen from 20 per cent to almost 60 per cent for those who attend religious services more than once a month.
Among the "less religious," the trend rose from 10 to 20 percent," Stone said.
The decline in sexual activity is also due to other factors, such as less social interaction and social drinking during the pandemic.
The study also found that people without jobs or with lower incomes were less likely to have sex.
Another reason could be the expansion of digital media, which seems to reduce the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which is "replacing" this need.
This trend has taken hold mainly during the lockdown in the time of the coronavirus pandemic.
The whole covid vaccine mandate is about whether a society should force part of its population to behave in a way they don't want, but which may save their lives.
It's a pretty tough question, and I'm personally most interested in the question of social conscience.
In other words, for example, the question of whether if we don't tell them to do it and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we could definitely have prevented the death of an 80-year-old man who really didn't know much, we didn't explain it well to him, he heard some misinformation, and as a result he didn't get vaccinated and eventually caught it and died.
On the other hand, I do not think that we can blame the death of a stubborn opponent of vaccination, who here alongside the SPD and KSČ rants about persecution and a totalitarian state.
From the statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of the unvaccinated pensioners probably belong to the second group, so they will really be able to blame themselves for it.
The Czech Republic without snow.
How will a mild winter affect the fight against drought?
This year's winter has so far brought one of the smallest snowfalls in recent times in the Czech Republic.
Ski resort operators cannot do without artificial snow, and the weather is also making it difficult to prepare the Jizerská 50 cross-country ski race.
Is this a trend or an exception?
And what will the lack of snow mean for the fight against drought in the Czech Republic?
I have one story, but it's not about the pannikar.
One time in middle school, our teacher took us all the way across town to a boatyard so we could take a boat ride on the river.
On the way there, we were walking down a fairly wide street, and in the middle of the street, we didn't see anyone - a follower of the Hare Krishna sect.
Of course, they came down on us.
I was lucky enough to escape, but one of my friends started talking.
When she left, we asked her and the teacher what she was saying to them.
"They were asking me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them I don't have a soul," she replied.
We were all laughing all the way to the boatyard, including the teacher.
We've been so mollycoddled.
Not much is happening, but the system is collapsing, says Orozovič
New German Chancellor Olaf Scholz flew to Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted with military honors by Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," Morawiecki said at a joint press conference after the meeting.
Scholz stressed that Europe must show together that it will not accept a violation of Ukraine's territorial integrity.
According to the Chancellor, the crisis triggered by the disturbing movements of Russian troops near the Ukrainian border should be dealt with through diplomatic negotiations, even within the framework of the "Normandy Group", which brings together France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said he informed the Chancellor about the situation on the Polish border with Belarus, whose leader Alexander Lukashenko has artificially created a migrant crisis and uses people as living targets and weapons, as we record hundreds of attempts to (illegally) cross the border every night.
I discussed further sanctions with the Chancellor to make the Lukashenko regime and its patrons in the Kremlin understand that we are determined to defend the eastern border of the EU.
According to DPA, Scholz assured that Warsaw can count on German support in its dispute with Belarus and condemned the inhumane treatment of refugees by Lukashenko's regime.
Drunk Polish nun caused an accident, tried to cover it up
The car returned to the scene a short time later, but it was being driven by a different nun who was trying to take the blame.
When the police officers told her that she could still lose her driving licence for failing to give way and driving away from the scene of the accident, she came clean, TVN24 reported.
She admitted that she hit the car of another nun, who asked her for help.
The police then came for Celestina's sister.
She was breathalysed and then, when it was found that she had more than two-and-a-half times the legal limit of alcohol in her system, her driving licence was immediately revoked.
At the same time, they told her that she would be questioned in court for her actions.
Hugo the dog is doing his best.
Juraj Šajmovič, however, did not keep an eye on his film.
Czech family comedy creators have looked at American stories about beloved dogs.
However, they forgot one important thing: the laws of the film industry.
After the kitsch film F. Brabec's Gump - the dog who taught people to live, the film Tady hlídáme my is now competing for the audience's emotions in cinemas.
The co-scriptwriter and director in one person, Juraj Šajmovič Jr., freely builds on his previous film Tady hlídám já from 2012.
The talking hedgehog, Hugo, is back on the scene, along with some familiar faces.
Julie and Ivan, the owners of a Šumava pension that is dying, and so they start to call in dog walkers, Julie's father with his partner and above all her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl, but a young woman experiencing her first love.
The director, together with his partner Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film’s producer), struggled with the storytelling in the previous dog film, but at least the children and the dog were amused.
This time, the writing duo has written an even weaker script, which provokes a mixture of awe and feelings of embarrassment.
Let's recap.
Julie, despite being a scientist, succumbs to the darkness of her desire for a child and when the right "constellation" occurs, she copulates with her forest engineer Ivan, wherever the coordinates determine - on the bonnet of a car or a church tower (of course, during a guided tour with a local guide), the retired colonel Mojmír, despite years of training, shoots his own daughter (Julie) in the forest, who falls into a coma, after which she is taken to the hospital by her family so that a miraculous process of healing can take place in the heart of the Šumava wilderness.
Nothing wrong with the restorative power of nature and the strength of animal companions.
Their owners know why they have them.
The viewer, however, can't help but wonder how much of this content pelmel full of unbelievable situations and figures was needed to convey this message.
A couple of thieves from the staff, a dog show, a Šumava charlatan, police officers arriving on the tip to look for "drugs" and discuss the fertilizing power of bone meal - and the baked family at the pension, of course, gets drunk.
When the heroine, after a long coma, wakes up and immediately sits down at the family table, made-up and with a cigarette, and demands her father's whiskey and some meat as a recovered vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
On top of that, the creators explain to the viewer that "this sometimes happens after a coma."
Šajmovič's team lacks basic dramaturgical knowledge of working with the text, the ability to build the main situation, a sense of the characters' characters and the point, and directorial guidance.
The acting is uneven, the editing aimless, and the overall impression muddled.
No matter how hard Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková or Nela Boudová try to keep their parties going, they don't have much to play with.
The only positive aspect of the film is the poetic shots of the Šumava nature by cameraman Vladimír Holomka and the pair of dachshunds.
It's not enough to sketch out a few characters, a flimsy plot and some dog jokes, let alone the more common vulgar terms the characters use.
Even long-term membership of the Dachshund Club - as in the case of the producer - is not an argument.
Good intentions to promote nature and the friendship between man and dog must be accompanied by the knowledge of the craft, if one wants to tell a believable story.
This was not successful in this case.
There's a bit too much eroticism and a minimum of feeling for the genre in a good family picture.
Even as an advert for canine therapy, this amateurishly-conceived piece wouldn't pass muster.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to constant insults from idiots like you.
There is a difference between offering and forcing, here you can see how you understand it, but that is only because you have never tried it.
The decision is always up to the customer, if they don't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you were to listen to a kid like that all the time, you might change your mind.
It is just like any other job, in this case it is a side hustle.
The Middle East is experiencing unusually dry months.
Winter is the only time of the year when it rains.
"The nearly complete absence of precipitation during November, as recorded at some stations, is unusual," the Israel Meteorological Service confirms.
For example, the village of Kfar Giladi in northern Israel reported just six percent of its long-term average rainfall for November.
This week's two-day storm was therefore more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It hasn't rained for a long time.
It's also the right Christmas backdrop, said Wasim Ashkar, a resident of Nazareth.
Precipitation in Israel comes almost exclusively in the winter months, is sporadic and irregular.
Forests are dependent on winter rains.
Without them, they dry up and are prone to fires.
It's not just about the forests, but also about drinking water supplies and irrigation for farmers.
Israel's largest freshwater source, the Sea of Galilee, filled to its brim this spring for the first time in three years, thanks to three rainy winters in a row.
Since then, the level has fallen.
The water managers have been warning about the drought for a long time.
"It is expected that as a result of global warming and climate change, there may be a decrease in rainfall in this area," Uri Schor, a spokesperson for the Israel Water Authority, said in 2018.
Israel can help itself with technologies such as desalination and recycling of waste water.
Economically weaker countries such as Lebanon, Syria and Jordan are worse off.
In the streets of Jordan's capital, Amman, tanker trucks are becoming more common.
Water pipes and private wells are drying up.
"This year I've seen a 70 to 80 percent increase in orders compared to the past two years," tanker truck driver Imad Suleiman said in September.
Clashes broke out between farmers and security forces in the Iranian city of Isfahan.
The drought was the reason for the protests.
The local riverbed was completely dry.
The region has had one of the driest Novembers in recent years.
Israel is preparing a military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister has declared that the Vienna talks have brought "no progress," and that he has informed Washington of plans to attack Iran's nuclear facilities.
Defense Minister Benny Gantz said Saturday that he had ordered the Israel Defense Forces to prepare for the possibility of a military strike against Iran, Jonathan Lis reports.
Gantz, who is in the United States, is trying to convince Americans to increase their pressure on Iran, but he also informed Washington of military preparations.
During a press conference in Florida, Gantz said that the nuclear talks in Vienna have not yielded "any progress" and the world powers "understand that the Iranians are playing with them."
This happened to me about 3 years ago.
I grilled her a little bit and grilled her during the conversation to find out what she actually wanted from me.
In the end, I found out that my suspicion of a pyramid scheme was justified.
Because I really don't like these kinds of tricks, I asked the lady some more questions and then thanked her and left.
Feel free to call me a scoundrel, but a pyramid is a pyramid and a financial advisor is a financial advisor.
Skiers went to the mountains over the weekend, with plenty of snow and good weather
Ski resorts in the Czech Republic experienced their first major influx of skiing enthusiasts this weekend.
After heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no shortage of snow, and some ski resorts have opened as a result.
Skiers were not deterred by the requirement to show their covid certificate at the lifts.
While tow-boat operators aren't complaining of a lack of customer interest, some ski-rental shops report weaker demand for their services than before the epidemic.
Thousands of people hit the cross-country ski trails and the ski slopes in the Liberec Region over the weekend.
The weather was kind to the skiers today, with sunshine and excellent snow conditions.
"We are happy, the opening weekend really started from Friday evening skiing, when we had the first skiers on the hill," said the director of the Ještěd Sports Area, Jakub Hanuš.
Hundreds of people went to the Jeseníky mountains for the first weekend of skiing in the new season.
Ski Aréna Karlov and the centre in Branná near Šumperk were open.
The weekend attendance was very good, with an estimated 400 people coming on Saturday and today.
The conditions are great.
Today the sun was shining, it was around minus three degrees, so perfect, said Rostislav Procházka, the representative of the ski resort in Branná.
Ski resort operators can only sell ski passes to people who are vaccinated or have recently had COVID-19.
With a few exceptions, people are prepared for this and they show the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Špindlerův Mlýn ski centre to ČTK.
"We've only had a handful of incidents," he added.
Some ski rental and equipment shops are reporting lower interest than before the pandemic.
Fortunately, there is interest in renting skis.
It is not like in previous years, but there are still enough customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Skiopava store in Opava.
They expect a greater influx during the ski courses.
David Šinták, a representative of the Hradec Králové-based company Snowbear, also feels that there is less interest in renting ski equipment due to the COVID-19 situation.
At that time, before the pandemic, we were already almost booked out.
Compared to the period before the pandemic, we are at about 50 percent, Šinták told ČTK.
According to him, people have become lethargic during the pandemic and have learned to sit at home.
On the other hand, the rental agency in the Novako complex in Boží Dar is very popular.
They started renting skis there a week ago, and those interested have to order them in advance.
"We start renting skis this weekend, but people have already called in advance, so we expect a lot of interest, just like last year," said the area manager, Pavlína Nováková.
According to her, the interest in the ski school is also comparable to the period before the epidemic.
If we want successful and rich people to stay in the country, they must be able to live a quality life here as they would abroad.
Socialist health care, where it is often difficult to find a dentist or a specialist doctor, is certainly not part of it.
Smart and skilled people who have no assets here are leaving the country.
A company owner does not just up and leave the country.
However, I fully agree with the rest of it.
If these people do not feel well in the Czech Republic and if these people do not see a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, they will not live in the Czech Republic.
Emigration from Hungary began when Orbán won one beautiful day, ruled for a year and suddenly the annual emigration rose by a few tens of thousands.
It is naive to think that the Czech Republic cannot find itself in such a position from one day to the next.
Another question is whether there will be elections at all.
If you live badly here, you can also win a traditional V4 madman.
The young and educated will leave, leaving his supporters and people whose property does not fit into a plane.
Terrifying photo!
Langmajer in the blood for a beer bet?
While it was autumn in full swing in the Czech Republic, the cast and crew of the film Island led by Jiří Langmajer (55) were enjoying tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a bloody photo of his face on social media.
Is it a real injury, or is it for filming?
The London police are still looking for the missing Czech woman.
She was last seen on her way home.
"Petra's disappearance is completely out of character and we are growing increasingly concerned for her welfare," Lucy O'Connor, of Lambeth police, said in a Saturday video.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and simply wants to know where she is," she continued.
According to her, the missing Czech woman left work on Sunday 28 November around 7:45 p.m. and headed home to the Camberwell district.
She was last seen on a bus about 30 minutes later.
Her disappearance was reported on December 3 by one of her co-workers.
According to British media, Srncová worked as a "healthcare assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of the Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are deeply concerned about our dear colleague Petra, who is missing," the group of health facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We are appealing for anyone who may have any information which could assist in locating her to contact police," the statement continued.
MP Harriet Harman, who drew attention to the Srncova case at a press conference on Saturday, has also called on the public to cooperate.
"She's been missing for a few days, she's only 32 years old, she's from the Czech Republic, her parents are understandably distraught," the Labour politician said, holding up a photo of the woman distributed by London police.
"I feel like we all have a particular responsibility to try to find her because she was out of her home country, away from her family, and working here for our healthcare system," Harman said.
Police have previously arrested one man in connection with the case, who remains in custody.
The BBC reports, however, that the police have not released any information about the man's identity or what he is suspected of doing.
Russia is not able to occupy Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (i.e. about 5 divisions).
I don't underestimate Ukraine either.
This is not "a huge amount", but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Notice that Ukraine keeps repeating that we are overstating the threat of an invasion, and is starting to get fed up with our presence.
I quoted above.
I don't know where he got the idea that Russia wants war.
War is a hell of a joke and Russia has the GDP of Italy.
The comparison with the situation in 38 is so different in so many points that I don't even know where to start.
I can now compare it to the First Punic War and the "annexation" of Sicily :D
I can imagine that after Ukraine announced that it would not abide by the Minsk agreements, Russia annexes those ridiculous republics.
That's all there is to it, and that's what the "concentration" at the border would be like.
Yes, pacta sunt servanda...
New timetables come into effect in Prague from Sunday, mainly affecting suburban services
Passengers in Prague's integrated transport system (PID) can look forward to several changes from Sunday, which will affect mainly suburban services.
New lines were created, some changed their routes, and others ceased to exist.
Mladoboleslavsko is now joining the integrated system.
From Sunday, fast trains from České Budějovice will stop in Zahradní Město in the capital.
S7 suburban trains will run on the route from Beroun to Český Brod, passing through Prague's main station.
The recently opened station in Prague-Zahradní Město will now be served by the R17 express train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
The PID will now be extended to other areas.
Among other things, the buses will go as far as Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatno near Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
Buses in the Mladá Boleslav region will be included, including lines that cross into the Liberec and Královéhradecký regions.
During the integration, 77 lines will be cancelled, 37 new ones will be introduced and the operation of 12 existing lines will be modified.
A new bus line 405 will run from Prague's Zličín to Žatec.
A new direct connection between Prague and Kralovice near Rakovník has also been established, replacing the discontinued S53 train line.
Services from Prague to Rakovník will be strengthened in the morning rush hour and on weekends, with the new express line number 404.
Lines 400 and 410 running to the Liberec Region are now included in the PID system.
They depart from the Střížkov metro station, not from the Nádraží Holešovice station.
Line 400 runs through Mělník, Dubou and Česká Lípa to Nový Bor, and selected services continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The supplementary line 410 goes through Mělník and Dubá to Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonné v Podještědí.
On the other hand, the operation of dozens of local lines in Central Bohemia has been cancelled or restricted, including lines to Mochov, Dobříš, and Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains leaving Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
Due to the modernisation of the railway, there are long-term restrictions on the lines Prague – Beroun, Prague – Lysá nad Labem and around Kolín.
Changes await passengers at other locations as well.
Buses are replacing some of the cancelled train lines, or the section of the 420 line from Dobříš with a connection from Prague, where it is possible to use PID tickets all the way to Milevsko.
Changes were made to the routes of lines 540 to 543 in Nymburk, and the routes of some buses on the border of Central Bohemia and Hořovicko in the Plzeň Region have been adjusted.
Healthy snack/lunch for the office from the supermarket
Hi, I do a regular 9-5 with a 30min break and my only option to get food is to go next door to Billy's or a bit further to Lidl.
Since I don't have much movement, I don't have the energy to exercise after work, so I have to eat as healthily and dietarily as possible.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy, and in a hurry I buy, at most, a pizza roll, and for a snack I buy a yoghurt and an apple.
The question is: what healthy food without the need for heat treatment would you recommend that I buy in the supermarket?
Not everyone is waiting for a meter of snow like you, so that's the way it is, unfortunately.
And it's not just trees you need to see.
Only the top of the tree can be hidden under the snow.
If it is damaged, the tree may be more susceptible to fungal disease.
I'm not saying it's the only reason why they don't allow us to ski off-piste, but it's one of them.
Dara's confession about the relationship with Nedvěd: I didn't look forward to this at all
Since Friday, the Czech show business pond has been nothing but the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedved.
They have been together since the summer, and the famous footballer has even divorced his wife for the singer.
Dara has now sent her fans a lengthy message explaining why she kept her love a secret from them for six months.
"I would like to claim that currently there is no one in the Czech Republic or Slovakia who does not know that Dara caught the bear, pardon me, Nedvěd," jokes Dara Rolins, who is madly in love with the most successful Czech football player.
But she packed him, not the other way around.
Three days are the centre of attention, and although they are used to public interest, they don't enjoy it.
And it's here.
What we both dreaded, but knew was inevitable, continues the singer.
I just don't know who is worse off.
Whether it's those who don't care about it at all and it pops up on them even from a can, or us, whose lives they dissect to the very last detail.
As if someone wanted to hear your opinion on whether or not you fit well with your husband or girlfriend, or if you insisted that everyone in detail know your list of ex-partners and be familiar with a list of your mistakes and faults.
That's a Žúžo, that's what you want, it annoys Dára.
The couple got together in Italy, where Rolins went to prepare her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has been vice-president of the Juventus football club for a long time.
They went public with the truth now, because they were waiting for the conclusion of Nedvěd's divorce.
He has been separated from his wife, Ivana, for three years, and they have only been legally separated for three weeks.
In any case, we thank those who rejoice with us and wish us well.
We are just people, we have families, children, pasts and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
This is why I love my new man and just as he is by my side, I am by his. In good times and bad, concluded Rolins.
Hello, other commenters have probably said everything important already, I just confirm that the dormitories are great for the beginning, most of my classmates met and became friends during the first semester or two and then found a shared apartment, which I think is the best option because you know who you'll be living with.
The apartments are usually not advertised very far in advance, so you probably won't find much now, but it won't hurt to take a look at the listings.
Otherwise, definitely avoid not only Cejlu, but also the surrounding area (streets like Vranovská, Francouzská, etc., that's a pretty bad address), and some parts of Židenice are a bit of a ghetto.
On the other hand, Veveří is very student-oriented, Královo Pole and the direction towards it is nice, and it's close to most of the VUT faculties (I don't know where you are starting).
I've never looked for a rental, but I'm a native Brňák, so I can give some advice on Brno in general if you're still missing some information.
That is an example of "normal" thinking for me.
It's actually fine that the state doesn't fund some schools enough, because of what a few doctors decided to do somewhere in Poland.
They should either learn what they want and pay for it themselves or follow the state curriculum and let the state pay for it.
We cannot allow a private actor to take over part of the education system just because it adds a few crowns to the full-fledged state contribution and will be able to teach what it wants in schools.
Such a claim loses some of its weight when it comes from a person who two days earlier wrote this about a petition calling for a boycott of the totalitarian state:
So a vote against someone having an abortion is the same as a vote against a statue standing in the square?
I would consult directly with the person who gave you the job.
Otherwise, I have already experienced in the process of cataloguing/digitising, that (and even long-term professionals) either guess it by eye, or write something like xxx *** or ... (according to the convention) and add a note that it is unreadable.
The truth is, in this case it's fairly readable, so I wouldn't recommend it.
Personally, I would probably deal with it in a comment, depending on what program you're using.
If you wanted to be a proper, conscientious student, you could look up some branded databases and find the nearest one.
But since it looks like you're drawing from a book, I'd guess that the author or printer simply created his own symbol that fit with what was physically on the coin.
PS: By the way, it's not a coincidence that it's Odryská říše (kingdom) and not OdryNská?
PSS: Someone has already figured it out here.
Check out that comment with ΦΙΛH
Politicians don't even know what "the theme" of our presidency will be.
This is a much bigger scandal than having interpreters with them.
The idea that they would pass something because no one understands the text is laughable.
All important approved documents are examined word for word, and a basic knowledge of English is not enough for this. This is the job of the lawyers.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in various EU institutions, and English is more useful for politicians for informal contacts, to establish non-standard relationships.
In addition to the English language, it's quite interesting after GB's exit from the EU.
I don't understand the hate on Ceylon.
I've been working there for three years now and I'm totally fine with it.
How many times do I drive home from work at 10pm and there's never a problem.
Only someone who has hardly ever been there can say that it is a ghetto.
Yes, most of the Roma population in Brno live there, but all they do is block the sidewalk and park where they shouldn't. It's certainly not the case that I'm afraid to go out on the street there in the evening.
So if you're looking for relatively cheap accommodation with good access to the centre, I'd definitely go for it.
Many of the apartments there are newly renovated or newly built.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dáda and his lover Gelemová like a post in a fence!
Who will she spend Christmas with?
On Sunday, most people lit the first candle on their advent wreath, Felix Slováček did not.
I don't have an Advent wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I've seen the wreath and Lucie must have one as well, said the saxophonist to Blesk, confirming Patrasová's words that she often visits her.
He visits, but does not live in their house in Vinohrady, where Dáda was left alone after his departure.
Slováček still does not know where he will be on Christmas Eve.
We recently met up with Anička, Felix and both grandchildren.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we were still talking, so we didn't break up for Christmas.
I really don't know where I'll be.
I buy gifts throughout the year and I will definitely buy something for Dáda and Lucie, probably a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who came to the launch of the music video himself at the Richman club.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
I always find someone to talk to, says Slováček, who was happy to meet Luděk Sobota's wife, Adriana, or singer Kamila Nývltová.
And he made it very clear.
And we are Iceland, so that we can afford not to have soldiers or weapons?
I doubt that someone will stop us, and our location is so strategic that an aggressor would have to be a complete idiot not to occupy this territory.
And I don't understand why it should be a bad argument, can you explain it to me?
I don't know of any other component that could be used in a crisis in hospitals.
There are not enough police officers and they cannot afford it, the same goes for firefighters and nowhere else is there such a high percentage of health-trained people at such a high level.
And the fact that our army is capable of defending just enough of Ostrava is a slap in the face of the previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for a long time.
A record-breaking drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change the agricultural subsidies, the countryside must not be just a food factory, says the journalist.
The Czech Republic is experiencing the worst drought in recent years.
According to the scientists, there is less water in mountainous and foothill areas, and even places that have never suffered from a lack of moisture have recorded smaller amounts of rainfall.
The drought that is affecting large parts of Central Europe is caused by climate change.
But the effects are also exacerbated by the way we manage the soil.
What should we prepare for in relation to the drought?
And how can we help nature in these difficult times?
Yes, it will be like that, I can barely keep my skates on the ice, I know what it's like to play hockey and that tactic (which I tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) is also generally a load of rubbish.
And whether you're the "Russian Bear" hockey team or the "Chinese Lama," it's different to lose by two goals even if you don't need to win the game at all costs.
But in any case, what I hear from the Czech commentators, who point out what the referees are paying attention to and what they are not paying attention to, whether it is men's or women's ice hockey, it is all very strange, but that is how it is with all sports, UEFA and "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
Controversy is everywhere.
And in my humble opinion, if it was the other way around, it would be the same as always, and that the Czech Republic has lost more often than it has won, it would be a classic "they lost" versus "WE won".
Coronavirus: Russia records more than 10 million infections
On Saturday 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9080 daily infections.
5766 people are hospitalised.
In total, 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, and another 74.
There are 1967 confirmed cases per 100,000 in the last 14 days, and 871 per 100,000 in the last week.
The number of infections in Russia exceeded 10 million on Sunday.
Over the past 24 hours, 29,929 new infections have been registered.
It's the lowest daily count since Oct. 13.
The total number of registered cases in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest daily death toll since the end of October.
The UK is facing an "inevitable" large wave of infections caused by Omicron, Dr Susan Hopkins, chief medical advisor to the UK Health Security Agency, said on Sunday.
New quarantine measures will be required.
People infected with omicron are already being hospitalised in the UK and Hopkins expects that number to rise.
So far, no one has died from the Omicron variant, but hospitalizations are occurring about 14 days after infection and deaths about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson appears to have broken the law by holding a Christmas quiz in Downing Street last December when a lockdown was in place and Christmas parties were banned.
One of Mr Johnson's ministers has defended the quiz as having taken place "virtually" on a computer.
But it was attended by groups of staff gathered around computers in Downing Street.
Pressure is growing in Britain for Johnson to step down as prime minister.
In December last year, when London was under a strict lockdown and Christmas parties were banned, Mr Johnson's ministers held numerous boozy bashes in defiance of the lockdown.
The British public and media are furious that Johnson and his government are making a mockery of them:
Paul Brand, ITV's political editor for Britain: Two years ago, Boris Johnson won a landslide general election victory.
Today, the Conservative Party is talking about the need to remove him from the post of prime minister.
Remarkably, the events unfolded so quickly.
Do you want to turn and save your skin?
Hungary is facing elections in the spring that could end Viktor Orban's 12-year rule.
They will be elections of European significance.
How fair can we expect them to be?
They won't be fair.
They are not likely to be free either, because the last two elections under Orbán were not free either.
His Fidesz party controls the media, redraws electoral district boundaries to its advantage, and does other small and large tricks.
The most recent one sounds like everyone will be able to choose where they want to vote in practice.
This would allow Fidesz to move voters from decided districts to those where the result is uncertain and the opposition could win.
So I'll just repeat that they won't be fair at all.
Do you think it will be as unfair as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is radically different.
In the past, it was not about whether Fidesz would win, but how much and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
Now, there is a real chance that the unified opposition will get more votes and seats.
This is unusual for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they play even harder to hold on to power?
Yes, we have some indications that they are ready to go beyond what they have done so far.
Recently, a recording of the speaker of parliament and one of the leaders of Fidesz, László Kövér, was leaked to independent media, in which he explained to the heads of the secret services that the opposition is a threat to national security.
Those are the signs of a new approach that you are talking about?
Yes, that's one of the innovations.
It all starts with the tongue.
I was beaten quite often, the last time when I was 14, my mother doesn't have much patience, I don't either, my father has been with her for a long time, but then he hits me extremely hard (only in relation to me).
I'm also very choleric and used to get very angry when I was little, to the extent that I used to lie on the floor in a fit of rage and turn completely blue, and they would have to take me under the shower to calm me down.
Sometimes they would spank me as a disciplinary measure, sometimes it was more that they didn't know what to do.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things through violence now as well. I used to fight a lot as a child, now I at least hit something to get it out of my system. When I was younger, I might have slapped my parents across the hand, for example (so I wouldn't get a slap across the face), so nothing extreme, but I always have that urge.
I am not able to say to what extent it is due to my explosive nature, but upbringing definitely has its part to play in it.
I'm worried that I will also lose my patience with my children and deal with it in the same way.
I think hitting children is simply wrong and that my parents shouldn't have done it, especially not at that moment when it was no longer "educational" but out of frustration, on the other hand, I guess every parent just screws up sometimes, it's probably not possible to not offend your children at all, so I don't blame them for it.
It doesn't offend me at all, I don't understand why the OP should be ashamed of it.
Laws must be clear and unambiguous.
I would call those who make laws in such a quality Kundami.
Otherwise, I would be interested to know whether you are afraid of losing your income?
Can you really count on people wanting and buying the product, and will you have the money to pay the mortgage?
Kočner's monstrous world.
Where will Slovakia move the trial of the murderers of journalist Kuciak?
In Slovakia, the main trial in the case against the four people accused of the murder of Ján Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová has begun.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner has changed Slovakia.
It has galvanised civil society, but it has also revealed the practices of the accused businessman Marián Kočner and his connections to the top echelons of Slovakian politics and justice.
How significant will the process be for Slovakia?
The journalists are to blame for this.
How is it possible that this petition received a lot more media attention than the counter-petition by the deans of all medical faculties, which came out a day or two later?
No, they let themselves be fooled and the company jumped ship.
People were dying of COVID on Czech TV half a year ago.
Another government ends and the law on the involvement of municipalities in the selection of a storage facility is nowhere to be found
Minister Karel Havlíček's proposal needs major revision
The government of Prime Minister Andrej Babiš is coming to an end and the law that was supposed to ensure respect for the interests of local communities and their citizens in the selection and permitting of a deep geological repository for high-level radioactive waste still does not exist.
The government's legislative council suspended the discussion of the proposal, which the Ministry of Industry and Trade submitted to the government after years of delays.
However, its content is in serious conflict not only with the affected municipalities united in the Platform Against the Deep Repository, but also with the Union of Towns and Municipalities of the Czech Republic.
Local authorities are legally entitled to expect a significant strengthening of their decision-making powers in relation to storage sites, which has been promised to mayors since 2011, when work on this legislation began, and which is required by the Czech Atomic Act and the European Directive.
We expect the new government to revise the proposal in line with its coalition agreement in cooperation with the municipalities.
The draft law proposed by Minister Karel Havlíček, which the Platform has access to, is criticised by municipalities primarily for the following: The proposed level of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process regarding the selection of a site for a storage facility is insufficient and cannot ensure the respect of the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It is only truly effective if communities or the public can influence whether the process will continue at a particular site.
This can be achieved by placing a duty on the Nuclear Decommissioning Authority to seek the consent of the affected local authorities before beginning a specific process.
The proposed real estate plan almost completely ignores the involvement of the public and turns the citizens of the municipalities into mere extras in the permit proceedings.
The draft lacks a system-wide compensation setting for municipalities for the entire process of locating and selecting a storage site, its licensing and operation.
According to today's legal norms, the representatives of the municipalities do not have many options for defending the interests of their citizens in the search for a storage site.
Only in some permitting proceedings can they submit their comments or appeal, but the decision is made by the authority or the minister in whose interest it is to issue the permit.
A possible lawsuit does not have a suspensive effect on the performance of survey or construction works.
Co-determination of local authorities, which the Platform is calling for, is a common principle in many democratically advanced countries, and certainly in those that have already advanced in the permitting of repositories, such as Sweden and Finland.
The preparation of the law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external law firms to prepare legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o., which SÚRAO signed and follows on from contracts with the lawyer Jan Zemánek.
According to the register of contracts, the total sum for this work is almost 4 million Czech crowns.
Antonín Seknička, Deputy Mayor of Cejle from the Hrádek area and spokesperson for the Platform Against a Deep Geological Repository, said: After the ministers of industry, who only pushed back the position of local self-government bodies in relation to state authorities in the search for a deep geological repository for highly radioactive waste, we are waiting for a significant turnaround from the new government.
We are also offering a helping hand.
We would also like to thank the Association of Towns and Municipalities, which shares the view of the directly affected municipalities in selected localities that the rights of municipalities are insufficient for such a major construction.
The platform against a deep storage facility brings together 51 members (35 municipalities and cities and 16 associations) to push for a change in the state's approach to dealing with spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to a deep storage facility.
The platform also advocates that the decision on the selection of a site for the possible storage should be subject to the prior approval of the affected municipalities.
John Goodman (69) was forced to lose weight out of fear: He lost 90 kg.
Although he didn't feel the need to change his lifestyle for a long time, in the end it was the doctors who scared him.
They told him that if he didn't lose weight, he would die.
And it worked.
Mr Goodman has lost a total of 90kg, which is half his original weight of 180kg, The Sun reports.
He showed off his new look at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers in Los Angeles.
The fat guy from the Roseanne sitcom is a completely different person!
John liked to joke that his friends and family urged him to lose weight because his large body caused furniture to break.
"I was eating everything," the actor said in a 2018 interview with AARP.
This time, I wanted to do it slowly.
Move, exercise.
I'm getting to an age where I can't afford to sit on my backside any more, he told ABC, whose transformation is remarkable.
Also, it depends on what kind of boss and in what context you want to use the word "boss".
If it's some text on a platform that expects readers from a gaming environment, I wouldn't translate it at all.
If it was a formal text, perhaps a university essay, I would probably be looking for ways to describe or explain the boss.
To top it off, there are different kinds of bosses.
For example, a game like Dark Souls etc. has multiple bosses, yes, and so a "boss" is something like a lord/ruler of a given level, and then there's the final boss...
In many games, there are hidden bosses (super bosses, hidden bosses), which are not required to be beaten in order to complete the game or level, but are often more powerful than standard bosses.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where there are bosses, but the player doesn't fight them directly (Tentacle, Gargantua), and can they be called bosses at all?
And then there are the mini-bosses.
In fact, it is difficult to translate the word boss in one word. Czech and other languages do not deal with this issue (the Catalan language is interesting in this regard, as it translates boss as the final opponent).
It's a computer-controlled opponent that is important to the story or the game in general, stronger than all the previous ones and guarding the completion of some level or task.
The whole world is searching for the missing Petra from London.
The Czech police were also involved.
British police have been looking for missing Petra Srncová since 3 December.
The Czech police were also involved in the search.
She has been searching for the 32-year-old woman from Uherské Hradiště since 7 December.
Interpol is also helping the British police.
Colleagues last saw Czech national Petra Srncová on 28 November.
The British police have been searching for her since 3 December.
Interpol has issued a so-called yellow notice for her.
The whole world is now looking for Peter.
"The Czech police are in close cooperation with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We are sharing information on the case," she added.
The well-known search for Petra has already appeared on the police website.
She is 168 centimetres tall, thin, has brown eyes and long straight hair of the same colour.
It should be from the region of Uherské Hradiště.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are worried about her as her disappearance is very unusual for her
Local MP, Harriet Harman, was involved in the search for Petra.
She took part in the distribution of flyers with Petra's face on them.
"We're very concerned about it," she said at a Saturday news conference.
In connection with the disappearance, British police have arrested one suspect.
It is not clear who the man is or what he had in common with Petra.
Agent Tesla is terrorising pre-Christmas Czechia.
While October data showed a slight decline in attack campaigns, last month saw a marked increase in attacks as the year drew to a close.
We recorded a large campaign in relation to Agent Tesla on November 18.
The attacks are specifically aimed at the Czech Republic.
The strategy of the attackers remains the same for the time being.
The infected attachment in the email is designed to get the user's attention with a name that refers to payments and financial transactions.
While last month the dangerous attachment had the word "invoice" in its name, this time it was marked as "Copy of invoice for 11,2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
The spyware has features that scan web browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook, Mozilla Thunderbird, and Yandex email clients.
The malicious code actively searches for stored credentials, which are then sent to the attackers.
The last major campaign in the Czech Republic took place at the end of August and beginning of September, and as the holidays and the end of the year approach, the activity of the attackers is once again on the rise.
In November, the Formbook spyware remained active.
Unlike Agent Tesla, in this case the attackers are not specifically targeting the Czech Republic, and security specialists have recorded global campaigns in November.
Compared to the October Formbook figures, it has slightly weakened in November, but it is still responsible for nearly a fifth of all detections.
The attacks were continuous throughout the month with heightened activity on the 3rd, 10th, and 15th of November.
The formbook usually contained an attachment with the .exe extension named REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
However, the term "invoice" continues to be used.
The attachment in Czech may be much more dangerous for a Czech user.
Security analysts have observed a significant decline and dampening of activity in the Fareit program, which was responsible for 1.6 per cent of attacks and had no major offensive campaign in the Czech Republic in recent months.
Today's demo of smart people who don't need oxygen, because oxygen is for vaccinated idiots.
The march through Prague was larger than the media reported.
Judging by the footage of the march along the embankment and according to my experience, I estimate that there were about 10,000 demonstrators.
People in the procession filled the embankment and the bridge and the opposite embankment road.
That's a lot of people.
An unprecedented number of passers-by spontaneously joined the march of about four thousand demonstrators.
I believe that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
That long-standing discontent among several large groups or layers of the population led to them finding a common language.
The anti-vaxxers, anti-maskers and the like would not be able to fill or pay for such a large procession.
The activities of the Chcípl pes association are on the rise in popularity, it reminds me of a Million Moments for Democracy Upside Down.
Sometimes, I get the impression that they even rent the same stage and equipment.
It's hard to say what kind of movement could be attracted from this dissatisfaction, it depends not only on the influx of money, but also on whether the three-dose Pfizer vaccine will not become four or more doses.
It will certainly not be a left-wing or centrist movement, you can bet on that.
The three-dose vaccine is almost certainly going to become a multi-dose vaccine, as it is clear that we are going to have to be revaccinated every six months.
I'm very glad that the vaccines saved us.
A great action by scientists, for which humanity has every reason to be proud.
End of an era as Bulgaria gets new PM pledging change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev has tasked Kiril Petkov of the anti-corruption movement We Continue the Change to form a new government, which won the November elections.
He has already managed to put together a broad coalition government that should take office in a few days.
The political crisis in the country has been going on since April, when the previous government lost the elections under the weight of the anti-corruption protests.
The victorious anti-corruption, anti-establishment parties could not agree on a coalition, so there were two more snap elections.
What do cats do when no one is watching?
It's a global hit made from "secretly" filmed footage.
In the UK, concerns have been growing over the fate of the 32-year-old Czech woman, who has been missing for several days in London.
Ms Srncova was last seen two weeks ago on her way home from work in the south of the British capital.
In addition to the police, her previous employer and the MP representing the part of London where she lived are also being informed about the case of the children's hospital worker.
"Her disappearance is completely out of character and we are becoming increasingly concerned for her welfare," said Lucy O'Connor, of the Lambeth Police, in a Saturday video.
"Her family in the Czech Republic are also very worried about her and just want to know where she is," she continued.
According to her, the missing Czech woman left work around 19:45 on Sunday, 28 November and headed home to the Camberwell area.
She was last seen on a bus about half an hour later.
Her disappearance was reported on December 3 by one of her colleagues.
According to British media, Srncová worked as a "health care assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are extremely concerned for our dear colleague Petra who is missing," the group of health facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We are appealing for anyone who may have any information which could assist in locating her to contact the police," the statement continued.
Zdeňka Dvořáková Kocourková, an amateur children’s room painter from Šumperk (and also a regional Pirate council member), was reported by an anonymous person for violating copyrights with her paintings.
However, the court ruled that Krteček's murals in the Šumperk rooms do not violate the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, there was a month-long hole in the road in the form of a channel without a lid.
It was a matter of life and death.
The municipality referred the complaints to the Road and Motorway Directorate (ŘSD), which the road belongs to, and since it did not respond, the pothole continued to grow.
Eventually, the authorities clarified responsibilities and ownership, and after a month, ŘSD began to "intensively address the situation".
